AN  INTEGRATED  NATIONAL  ALL–HAZARDS 

ALERT  SYSTEM 

S.  HRG.  109–1095 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON DISASTER PREVENTION AND 

PREDICTION 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JULY  27,  2005 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

62–408 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2010 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office,

http://bookstore.gpo.gov. For more information, contact the GPO Customer Contact Center,

U.S. Government Printing Office. Phone 202–512–1800, or 866–512–1800 (toll-free). E-mail, gpo@custhelp.com.

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  DISASTER  PREVENTION  AND  PREDICTION 

JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina,  Chairman 
TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska,  Ranking 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on July 27, 2005 
...............................................................................
Statement of Senator DeMint  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator E. Benjamin Nelson  ............................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Hoover,  Reynold  N.,  Director,  Office  of  National  Security  Coordination,  Fed-
eral  Emergency  Management  Agency  (FEMA),  Department  of  Homeland 
Security  .................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Lawson, John M., President/CEO, Association of Public Television Stations  ....
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Guttman-McCabe,  Christopher,  Assistant  Vice  President,  Homeland  Security 
and Regulatory Policy, CTIA—The Wireless AssociationTM  .............................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Moran,  Kenneth,  Acting  Director,  Office  of  Homeland  Security  Enforcement 
Bureau, Federal Communications Commission (FCC)  ......................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Paese,  Mark,  Director,  Maintenance,  Logistics  and  Acquisition  Division,  Na-
tional  Weather  Service,  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration 
(NOAA)  ..................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Taylor,  Richard,  Executive  Director,  North  Carolina  Wireless  911  Board; 
Chairman,  the  COMCARE  Alliance  and  E–911  Institute;  Partner,  the  Na-
tional Emergency Alerting and Response Systems Initiative (NEARS)  ..........
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Page 
1 
1 
2 
17 

4 
6 
26 
28 

32 
33 

8 
9 

12 
14 

37 
38 

Inouye, Hon. Daniel K., U.S. Senator from Hawaii, prepared statement  ...........

55 

APPENDIX 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

AN  INTEGRATED  NATIONAL  ALL–HAZARDS 

ALERT  SYSTEM 

WEDNESDAY,  JULY  27,  2005 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON DISASTER PREVENTION AND 
PREDICTION, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The Subcommittee met, pursuant to notice, at 10:05 a.m. in room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Jim  DeMint, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. JIM DEMINT, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH CAROLINA 

Senator  DEMINT.  Good  morning.  I  want  to  thank  everyone  for 
coming. We’ve got other Members, including our Ranking Member, 
on the way, but, in deference to those who are here, let’s get start-
ed with this hearing. 

Somewhere  in  America  today,  a  community  will  likely  be  im-
pacted  by  a  disaster,  be  it  an  accidental  manmade  disaster  or  a 
natural  disaster  of  some  sort.  And  as  the  tragic  events  in  Britain 
and  Egypt  have  shown  us,  the  threat  of  a  terrorist  disaster  still 
looms  large.  Regardless  of  the  nature  or  scale  of  these  disasters, 
the Nation’s emergency responders need the capability to promptly 
and effectively communicate with the citizens in their communities. 
For a number of years, America has employed a variety of alert-
ing  methods;  most  notably,  the  Emergency  Broadcast  System  and 
the  NOAA  Weather  Radio.  These  systems  have  saved  numerous 
lives.  But  in  this  increasingly  wired  and  wireless  world,  we  need 
to  be  aware  that  if  we’re  going  to  communicate  more  effectively 
with  citizens,  we  need  to  look  hard  at  modernizing  and  improving 
the  system.  This  means  moving  beyond  the  hodgepodge  of  alerting 
technologies  that  are  spread  throughout  Federal  agencies.  It  will 
mean increasing coordination with state and local governments, be-
yond  what  we  do  today.  It  will  require  the  Federal  Government  to 
move out of the analog era and embrace the digital revolution. 

This  will  not  be  the  work  of  the  Federal  Government,  alone.  If 
this  system  is  truly  to  be  an  effective  tool  to  alert  the  public,  it 
must  continue  to  embrace  the  public-private  partnership  that  has 
served the system well in the past. 

For  the  past  five  decades,  the  public  alert  system  has  effectively 
separated the generation of alerts from the actual dissemination of 
alerts. It has always been, and should continue to be, the responsi-
bility of the government to assess the threat and generate an alert. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

This is clearly a core responsibility of the local, State, and Federal 
governments,  and  there  should  be  no  liability  for  carriers  who 
transmit these alerts to citizens. 

The  actual  distribution  of  the  alerts  should  remain  with  the  pri-
vate sector. The broadcasting community has been extremely coop-
erative  with  governments  in  delivering  alerts.  Their  cooperation 
has been a true public service. I am optimistic this cooperation will 
continue as the next-generation system develops. 

I’m looking forward to the testimony of our witnesses this morn-
ing.  Appearing  before  the  Committee  this  morning  are  representa-
tives  of  the  Federal  Emergency  Management  Agency,  the  Federal 
Communications  Commission,  and  the  NOAA  Weather  Services  to 
discuss  how  the  various  agencies  of  the  Federal  Government  are 
working together to improve the Federal Government’s alerting ca-
pabilities and to improve the current analog system. 

I’m  also  looking  forward  to  the  comments  of  our  private-sector 
witnesses.  As  I  mentioned  earlier,  the  private  sector  is  going  to 
play  an  essential  role  in  making  sure  the  system  works.  I’m  inter-
ested  in  getting  an  assessment  from  the  cellular  industry  on  how 
we  can  work  with  them  to  ensure  their  subscribers  are  alerted  to 
potential  threats.  I’m  also  looking  forward  to  reviewing  the  capa-
bilities of the DTV towers to transmit data and information to our 
communities  in  a  time  of  crisis.  Finally,  it’s  the  first-responders 
who are going to be charged with responding to a crisis, and I look 
forward  to  hearing  from  them  on  what  type  of  tools  they  need  to 
communicate with the public. 

This hearing is essential. The Committee is moving forward with 
developing  a  National  All-Hazards  Alert  System.  Legislation  is 
being  developed  now.  The  system  is  too  important  to  the  Nation 
not  to  get  it  right.  The  input  of  today’s  witnesses  will  provide  us 
with  the  guidelines  for  a  system  that  will  serve  the  Nation  well. 
When we get the system right, it will help protect our citizens from 
the threat posed by natural and manmade disasters. 

With  that,  I  yield  to  my  Ranking  Member  for  any  opening  com-
ments  he  may  have,  and  then  I’d  like  to  introduce  our  first  panel 
of witnesses. 

STATEMENT OF HON. E. BENJAMIN NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEBRASKA 
Senator BEN NELSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
First,  I  want  to  thank  you  for  bringing  together  the  witnesses 
and  calling  this  hearing  today.  I  want  to  thank  all  the  witnesses, 
as  well.  It’s  an  important  issue,  as  the  Chairman  has  indicated, 
and I appreciate your taking time to be here today to enlighten us. 
When  our  Nation’s  system  of  alerts  was  first  established,  it  was 
in  response  to  the  threat  of  a  possible  attack  from  another  nation. 
Now,  today  Americans  rely  on  a  patchwork  of  largely  voluntary 
systems to inform them of a range of hazards, from thunderstorms 
and tornadoes, to AMBER Alerts, to acts of terrorism. 

While  several  efforts  are  currently  underway  by  various  govern-
ment agencies to make this system of public warnings more useful 
and timely, we’re still relying on this patchwork of technologies and 
methods  of  dissemination.  To  be  effective,  though,  a  warning  sys-
tem  must  be  able  to  detect  a  hazard,  disseminate  a  warning,  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

suggest  a  response  in  a  timely  fashion.  For  predictable  long-lead- 
time  hazards,  like  hurricanes,  the  current  warning  system  seems 
to  be  relatively  effective.  But  for  hazards  with  little  or  no  lead 
time, like a tsunami or tornadoes or acts of terrorism, we must en-
sure  that  the  delivery  of  emergency  alerts  is  both  effective  and 
timely. 

In  addition,  the  systems  used  to  transmit  these  warnings  must 
be reliable and include redundant facilities to ensure that notifica-
tion  is  not  disrupted  or  hampered  by  inadequate  systems  or  dam-
age to infrastructure. 

Chairman  DeMint,  I  thank  you  for  this  hearing,  and  I  look  for-
ward  to  hearing  more  about  what  our  Federal  agencies  are  doing 
to  better  coordinate  their  efforts  to  make  these  warning  systems 
more  robust  and  cohesive.  I  think  it’s  important  that  we  be  aware 
of our shortcomings, at the same time, though, in this area. 

This  hearing  will,  hopefully,  help  us  to  learn  more  about  what 
Congress  can  do  to  help  all  of  you  who  are  working  to  make  sure 
that we have these systems and help deliver the best warning sys-
tem  possible.  I  hope  this  hearing  will  focus  our  attention  on  what 
technologies  we  can,  and  should,  be  taking  advantage  of  to  ensure 
the safety of our citizens. But, at the same time, I hope we will not 
become  so  enamored  by  the  most  cutting-edge  advanced  tech-
nologies that we forget the common-sense things that we can do to 
make sure that warnings reach all people, whether we’re in a large 
metropolitan area or someone working in a cornfield. 

I look forward to the testimony, and I’m anxious to hear the wit-

nesses. 

Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator DEMINT. Thank you, Senator Nelson. 
Appearing before the Subcommittee this morning is Mr. Reynold 
Hoover.  Mr.  Hoover  is  the  Director  of  the  Office  of  National  Secu-
rity  Coordination  at  FEMA.  Mr.  Hoover’s  office  is  the  program 
manager  for  the  Integrated  Public  Alert  and  Warning  System 
Project,  and  he  will  be  discussing  the  result  of  phase  one  of  the 
project, and plans for phase two. 

Joining  him  is  Mr.  Mark  Paese,  Director  of  Maintenance,  Logis-
tics, and Acquisition Services at the National Weather Service. Mr. 
Paese  will  be  discussing  the  NOAA  Weather  Radio  System  and 
NOAA’s work to improve and modernize the system. 

Finally, on this panel is Mr. Kenneth Moran, and he’s the Acting 
Director of the Office of Homeland Security at the Federal Commu-
nication  Commission.  Mr.  Moran  will  discuss  the  Commission’s  re-
cent  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking  on  improvements  of  the  Emer-
gency  Alert  System  and  the  comments  the  Commission  has  re-
ceived. 

With  that,  I’ll  start  with  Mr.  Hoover.  Mr.  Hoover,  if  you  will 
please  provide  a  short  summary.  These  lights  will  be  your  guide. 
I think you have 5 minutes. And the red lights indicates you might 
be  going  over.  And  we  will  appreciate  your  comments.  Thank  you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

STATEMENT OF REYNOLD N. HOOVER, DIRECTOR, 
OFFICE OF NATIONAL SECURITY COORDINATION, 

FEDERAL EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY (FEMA), 

DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY 

Mr. HOOVER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Good  morning,  Chairman  DeMint  and  members  of  the  Com-
mittee.  My  name  is  Reynold  Hoover.  I’m  the  Director  of  the  Office 
of  National  Security  Coordination  in  the  Federal  Emergency  Man-
agement  Agency,  FEMA,  which,  as  you  know,  is  a  part  of  the  De-
partment of Homeland Security. 

Thank you for the opportunity to appear before you today to dis-
cuss  the  role  and  activities  in  the  Department  of  Homeland  Secu-
rity  and  FEMA  to  support  the  important  mission  of  public  alert 
and  warning  using  an  Integrated  Public  Alert  and  Warning  Sys-
tem, or IPAWS, approach. FEMA, through my office, serves as the 
Lead  Agent  for  the  Federal  Government’s  continuity  of  operations 
and continuity of government programs, as the Executive Agent for 
the  national-level  Emergency  Alert  System,  or  EAS,  and  the  De-
partment’s  Program  Manager  for  the  Integrated  Public  Alert  and 
Warning System Initiative. 

This morning, I’d like to take a few moments to tell you how the 
Department  and  our  partners  are  improving  and  building  an  en-
hanced  capability  to  provide  nationwide  all-hazards  alert  and 
warning using digital and other cutting-edge technologies in an in-
tegrated and coordinated manner. 

The current EAS system is designed to provide the President the 
capability  to  transmit  to  the  nation,  within  10  minutes,  from  any 
location at any time. State and local emergency managers can, and 
do,  activate  the  EAS  for  state  and  local  public  alert  and  warning 
messages,  such  as  AMBER  Alerts,  hazardous-material  incidents, 
and severe weather warnings. 

With  that  as  a  point  of  reference,  let  me  briefly  describe  to  you 
and  the  Committee  our  efforts  toward  building  a  next-generation, 
all-hazards alert and warning system. 

This  fiscal  year,  we  began  a  digital  alert  and  warning  system 
pilot  in  the  national  capital  region  with  the  Association  of  Public 
Television  Stations.  Significantly,  through  the  voluntary  coopera-
tion  and  full  participation  of  public  and  commercial  broadcasters, 
satellite  radio,  the  cellular  telephone  industry,  technology  devel-
opers, pager service providers, cable operators and others, we have 
successfully  demonstrated  an  ability  to  transmit  a  variety  of  alert 
and  warning  messages  via  digital  television  and  satellite  to  a  full 
range of retransmission medium using a common alerting protocol. 
We  are  especially  pleased  that  NOAA  and  the  FCC  have  been  full 
partners with us in this digital alert and warning pilot. 

This  pilot  has  enabled  us  to  establish  a  foundation  for  a  unified 
national  all-hazards  system  and,  building  upon  the  success  in  the 
national  capital  region,  we’re  moving  the  digital  EAS  pilot  into  a 
second phase of testing and development to demonstrate a national 
capability,  identify  technological  challenges,  and  develop  a  nation-
wide implementation plan. 

Because  the  next-generation  national  warning  system  must  in-
corporate  an  ability  to  deliver  a  message  to  a  precise  group,  we 
have  partnered  with  NOAA  to  pilot  a  Geo-Targeted  Alerting  Sys-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

tem,  called  GTAS,  under  the  IPAWS  umbrella  to  demonstrate  the 
ability to provide geographically-targeted warnings. 

Mr. Chairman, our IPAWS solution recognizes the ubiquity of the 
Internet  and  the  powerful  tool  it  can  be  in  our  national  toolbox  of 
alert and warning systems. In that regard, we are finalizing a coop-
erative agreement with the National Association of State Chief In-
formation  Officers  to  pilot  an  AMBER-Alert-like  portal  for  all-haz-
ards alert and warning. This effort will build upon the success and 
lessons  learned  that  the  Department  of  Justice  has  demonstrated 
in  providing  an  effective  web-portal  solution  for  its  AMBER  Alert 
Program. 

In  order  to  assure  connectivity  for  Presidential  emergency  mes-
sages,  we  are  upgrading  the  Primary  Entry  Point,  or  PEP,  system 
as  part  of  the  IPAWS  to  a  satellite  distribution  system,  and  we’ll 
be  expanding  the  number  of  PEP  broadcast  stations  so  that  each 
state and territory will have a direct satellite-receive capability. By 
leveraging  public-private  partnerships,  these  critical  upgrades  will 
ensure  the  survivability  of  radio  broadcast  systems  in  the  event  of 
a catastrophic attack on the homeland. 

And we recognize, Mr. Chairman, that there is no single solution 
set  that  will  meet  everyone’s  alert  and  warning  requirements. 
That’s why we are seeking the most appropriate interoperable solu-
tions  to  develop  the  Integrated  Public  Alert  and  Warning  System 
approach. 

We believe that IPAWS, using digital technology, in combination 
with  upgraded  Primary  Entry  Point  EAS  capabilities,  will  provide 
Federal, state, and local emergency managers and leaders with the 
tools they need to protect America from both manmade and natural 
disasters.  But,  more  importantly,  the  IPAWS  solution  is  intended 
to  complement,  not  compete  or  interfere  with,  existing  alert  and 
warning systems. Moreover, the IPAWS is based upon the premise 
of providing alert and warning messaging in a coordinated manner 
over as many platforms as possible to ensure the widest public dis-
semination and receive capabilities. 

Of  equal  importance,  we  are  reaching  out  to  stakeholders  and 
alert  and  warning  system  users  through  a  series  of  IPAWS  semi-
nars.  Significantly,  our  most  recent  seminar  included  representa-
tives  from  the  disabled  community  who  told  us  about  the  chal-
lenges  they  face  with  regard  to  alert  and  warning.  As  we  continue 
that dialogue, we will incorporate their concerns with IPAWS solu-
tions. 

Mr. Chairman, these are just some of the examples of how FEMA 
and the Department of Homeland Security have taken seriously its 
responsibility  to  ensure  quick  and  accurate  dissemination  of  alert 
and warning information to our homeland security partners and to 
the American public. 

Thank  you,  again,  for  the  invitation  to  speak  and  for  your  sup-
port  of  the  Department’s  mission  and  for  your  interest  in  an  effec-
tive next-generation all-hazards alert and warning system. And I’ll 
be pleased to answer any questions you may have. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Hoover follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REYNOLD N.  HOOVER,  DIRECTOR,  OFFICE OF NATIONAL 
SECURITY COORDINATION,  FEDERAL EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY (FEMA), 
DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY 
Good  morning,  Chairman  DeMint  and  members  of  the  Committee.  I  am  Reynold 
N.  Hoover,  the  Director  of  the  Office  of  National  Security  Coordination  (ONSC) 
within the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA). Thank you for the op-
portunity to appear before you today to discuss the role and activities of the Depart-
ment  of  Homeland  Security  and  FEMA  to  support  the  important  mission  of  public 
alert  and  warning  using  an  Integrated  Public  Alert  and  Warning  System  (IPAWS) 
approach. 

FEMA,  through  my  office,  serves  as  the  lead  agent  for  the  Federal  Executive 
Branch’s  Continuity  of  Operations  (COOP)  and  Continuity  of  Government  (COG) 
programs and as the Executive Agent for the national-level Emergency Alert System 
(EAS).  Our  office  also  functions  as  the  Department’s  Program  Manager  for  the 
IPAWS  initiative  of  which  EAS  is  a  component.  As  such,  we  are  working  in  close 
cooperation  with  the  Information  Analysis  and  Infrastructure  Protection  (IAIP)  Di-
rectorate to facilitate coordinated efforts within the Department. I also serve as one 
of  the  managing  Co-Chairs  of  the  White  House  Task  Force  on  Effective  Warning 
that  was  chartered  by  the  Office  of  Science  Technology  and  Policy  and  Homeland 
Security Council. This recently established Task Force has representation from key 
public  alert  and  warning  stakeholders  in  the  Federal  Executive  Branch  and  is  Co- 
Chaired  by  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA).  On  all 
of  these  public  alert  and  warning  initiatives,  we  share  close  relationships  with  the 
Federal  Communications  Commission  (FCC)  which  generally  regulates  EAS  tech-
nical standards, procedures and protocols, and with NOAA which is a primary EAS 
user. 

We appreciate the Alert and Warning funds Congress has provided to the Depart-
ment  to  improve  our  alert  and  warning  capabilities.  Your  funding  will  help  us  pro-
vide  Americans  with  critical  and  timely  information  alerts  and  warnings  that  will 
save  lives  and  property.  This  morning  I  would  like  to  take  a  few  moments  to  tell 
you about the EAS and IPAWS which is the foundation upon which the Department 
is  improving,  and  building,  an  enhanced  capability  to  provide  nationwide  alert  and 
warning  using  cutting  edge  technologies,  in  an  integrated  and  coordinated  manner. 
The EAS in its current form was established in 1994 and is essentially a cascade, 
trickle  down,  distribution  system  from  the  FEMA  Operations  Centers  to  34  des-
ignated  Primary  Entry  Point  (PEP)  radio  broadcast  stations.  At  the  request  of  the 
President,  we  distribute  a  Presidential  level  message  to  the  PEP  stations,  which  in 
turn  re-broadcast  the  signal  to  monitoring  stations  down  stream  which  then  broad-
cast  the  message  over  TV  and  radios.  The  system  is  designed  to  provide  the  Presi-
dent  the  capability  to  transmit  within  10  minutes  from  any  location  at  any  time. 
This Presidential message is mandatory, must take priority over any other message 
and  must  preempt  other  messages  in  progress.  All  other  broadcasts  of  emergency 
messages are voluntary. Nevertheless, state and local emergency managers can, and 
do, activate the EAS for state and local public alert and warning messages such as 
AMBER alerts, hazardous material incidents and weather warnings. NOAA, and the 
National  Weather  Service,  serve  as  the  originator  of  emergency  weather  informa-
tion, and play a significant role in the implementation of EAS at the state and local 
level. While FEMA tests on a weekly basis the connectivity to the 34 PEP stations, 
the national level EAS has never been fully activated. 

As you are well aware, the tragic events of September 11 caused a paradigm shift 
in how we think about homeland security and, in particular, alert and warning. As 
efficient  and  useful  as  the  EAS  has  been,  we  in  FEMA  and  the  Department  of 
Homeland Security realize that the alert and warning system that so many millions 
of  people  depend  upon  is  not  everything  to  everyone  all  of  the  time.  With  the  alert 
and warning funding provided this year, FEMA, IAIP and our partners in the Fed-
eral Government are making great progress in our ability to reach more of the peo-
ple,  more  of  the  time.  We  believe  in  a  very  short  period  of  time,  leveraging  public- 
private  partnerships  and  using  existing  digital  and  other  cutting  edge  technologies, 
the Department will be able to provide all hazards alerts and warnings to the great-
est  number  of  people.  This  includes  persons  with  disabilities  and  individuals  for 
whom English is a second language. 

For  example,  we  have  been  conducting  a  Digital  Emergency  Alert  System  pilot 
project in the National Capital Region with the Association of Public Television Sta-
tions.  This  pilot  has  successfully  demonstrated  how  the  capabilities  of  America’s 
public  broadcasters  can  be  utilized  to  dramatically  enhance  our  ability  to  provide 
the American people with critical, and lifesaving, information. Significantly, through 
the  voluntary  cooperation  and  full  participation  of  public  and  commercial  broad-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

casters, satellite radio, the cellular telephone industry, technology developers, pager 
service providers, cable operators, and others, we have successfully demonstrated an 
ability to transmit a variety of alert and warning messages via digital television and 
satellite  to  a  full  range  of  retransmission  media  using  a  common  alerting  protocol. 
We  are  especially  pleased  that  NOAA  and  the  FCC  have  been  full  partners  with 
us in this Digital Alert and Warning System pilot and have recently added the De-
partment of Justice and The Weather Channel to our list of pilot participants. 

Building upon the success of our Digital EAS pilot we have begun a second phase 
expansion  in  which  we  will  replicate  our  experience  in  the  National  Capitol  Region 
at other sites across the country using public television’s existing digital infrastruc-
ture.  Our  intent  in  this  second  phase  of  the  Digital  EAS  pilot  is  to  demonstrate  a 
national  capability,  identify  technological  challenges,  and  develop  a  nationwide  im-
plementation plan. 

Because  there  is  no  single  solution  set  available  that  can  provide  for  all  of  the 
alert  and  warning  systems  requirements  for  Federal,  State  and  local  users,  our 
IPAWS uses a ‘‘system of systems’’ approach and does not totally rely upon the dig-
ital  infrastructure  of  Public  Television.  Working  in  partnership  with  NOAA  we  are 
including  under  the  IPAWS  umbrella  a  Geo-Targeted  Alerting  System  (GTAS), 
which  uses  reverse  911  technology,  to  demonstrate  and  test  the  ability  to  provide 
targeted  warning  down  to  the  individual  household  or  business.  This  GTAS  pilot 
will  be  conducted  in  the  National  Capital  Region  with  the  goal  of  expanding  alert 
and warning capabilities to include plume hazard warning. 

Since the beginning of the IPAWS initiative our focus has been demonstrating and 
developing the best technologies available without regard to the emergency message 
content.  Moreover,  because  we  are  incorporating  common  alerting  protocols  and 
using digital technology we have better positioned a national alert and warning sys-
tem  to  be  an  all  hazards  system.  In  this  regard,  the  recent  passage  of  the  Intel-
ligence  Reform  Bill  directed  the  Department  to  work  with  the  National  Association 
of  State  Chief  Information  Officers  (NASCIO)  to  demonstrate  an  Amber  Alert  like 
web  portal.  We  have  been  working  with  NASCIO  to  finalize  a  Cooperative  Agree-
ment  that  will  help  us  add  another  powerful  dimension  to  the  IPAWS.  This  effort 
will  also  build  upon  the  successes  and  lessons  learned  that  the  Department  of  Jus-
tice  has  demonstrated  in  not  only  partnering  with  the  wireless  community  to  pro-
vide  missing  child  alerts,  but  also  providing  an  effective  web  based  portal  solution 
for its Amber Alert program. 

A primary mission of our office remains assuring the ability of the President, and 
senior  government  leaders,  to  address  the  Nation  under  the  most  extreme  cir-
cumstances.  This  year,  we  are  upgrading  the  Primary  Entry  Point  (PEP)  system 
from  its  current  ground-based  dial  up  capability  to  a  satellite  distribution  system. 
We will also be expanding the number of PEP broadcast stations so that each state 
and  territory  will  have  a  direct  satellite  receive  capability.  These  critical  upgrades 
will  ensure  the  survivability  of  radio  broadcast  systems  in  the  event  of  a  cata-
strophic incident. Moreover, by leveraging public-private partnerships with satellite 
and  public  radio,  we  are  able  to  significantly  enhance  the  Emergency  Alert  System 
without a major investment in new infrastructure. 

We  recognize  that  there  is  no  single  solution  set  that  will  meet  everyone’s  alert 
and  warning  requirements,  that  is  why  FEMA,  IAIP  and  the  Department  has 
teamed up with NOAA, the FCC, DOJ and the private sector to find the most appro-
priate  interoperable  solutions  to  develop  the  Integrated  Public  Alert  and  Warning 
System  approach.  We  believe  that  IPAWS,  using  digital  technology  in  combination 
with  upgraded  Primary  Entry  Point  EAS  capabilities,  will  provide  Federal,  state 
and local emergency managers and leaders with the tools they need to alert America 
about both man-made and natural disasters. At the same time we are aware of the 
concerns  of  our  state  partners  who  have  invested  in  their  own  alert  and  warning 
systems. With that in mind, IPAWS is intended to be fully interoperable with those 
systems  using  common  alerting  protocols.  As  we  proceed,  we  will  continue  to  reach 
out  to  state  and  local  users  to  integrate  a  national  alert  and  warning  system  into 
their  existing  capabilities  which  will  result  in  significant  improvements  in  public 
awareness during hazardous events. 

Because  our  IPAWS  framework  is  based  upon  the  premise  of  providing  alert  and 
warning  messaging  in  a  coordinated  manner,  over  as  many  platforms  as  possible, 
to  ensure  the  widest  dissemination  and  public  receive  capabilities,  the  Department 
of  Homeland  Security  is  also  providing  funds  to  NOAA  for  system  upgrades  to  the 
NOAA Weather Radio All Hazards network. In addition, in partnership with the De-
partment  of  Education  and  the  Department  of  Commerce,  IAIP  is  funding  a  pilot 
program to purchase NOAA Weather Radio All Hazards receivers for certain public 
schools  across  the  Nation.  We  are  also  reaching  out  to  the  many  stakeholders  and 
alert  and  warning  systems  users  through  a  series  of  IPAWS  seminars.  Our  first 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

seminar was conducted in April and brought together Federal, state, local, and pri-
vate  sector  groups  to  begin  a  dialog  with  us  on  IPAWS.  Significantly,  the  seminar 
attendees  included  representatives  from  the  disabled  community  who  told  us  about 
the  challenges  they  face  with  regard  to  alert  and  warning.  We  are  continuing  that 
dialogue  and  working  to  incorporate  their  concerns  with  IPAWS  solutions.  The  De-
partment,  and  our  Federal  partners,  will  continue  these  IPAWS  outreach  seminars 
as a means to educate the public and ensure we are adding needed alert and warn-
ing  capabilities—not  adding  another  burden  on  those  who  use  and  depend  upon 
such systems to save lives and protect property. 

We  are  pleased  that  the  FCC,  last  year,  issued  a  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking 
with  regard  to  the  Emergency  Alert  System.  We  believe  that  the  FCC’s  efforts  in 
this  matter  will  help  us  strengthen  and  improve  alert  and  warning  for  the  general 
public and we look forward to continuing our close cooperation with the Commission 
as they move toward a decision. 

Finally, Mr. Chairman, the Task Force on Effective Warning that I mentioned at 
the outset of my remarks is working to develop a national alert and warning policy 
that  recognizes  the  IPAWS  solution.  Moreover,  with  the  help  of  the  Department  of 
the  Interior’s  USGS,  and  other  emergency  message  originators  in  the  Federal  Gov-
ernment,  we  will  be  able  to  build  upon  their  experiences  and  capabilities  to  incor-
porate  tsunami,  earthquake  and  other  warnings  to  the  public  into  a  national  all 
hazards IPAWS. 

Mr.  Chairman  these  are  just  some  examples  of  how  FEMA  and  the  Department 
of Homeland Security has taken seriously its responsibility to ensure the quick and 
accurate  dissemination  of  alert  and  warning  information  to  our  homeland  security 
partners and the American public. 

Thank you again for the invitation to speak, for your support of the Department’s 
mission,  and  for  your  interest  in  effective  alert  and  warning  systems.  I  will  be 
pleased to answer any questions you may have. 

Senator  DEMINT.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Hoover.  We’ll  save  our  ques-

tions until the panel has completed their statements. 

Mr. Moran? 

STATEMENT OF KENNETH MORAN, ACTING DIRECTOR, 

OFFICE OF HOMELAND SECURITY, ENFORCEMENT BUREAU, 

FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION (FCC) 

Mr.  MORAN.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Senator  Nelson. 
I’m  Kenneth  Moran,  Acting  Director  of  the  Enforcement  Bureau’s 
Office  of  Homeland  Security  at  the  Federal  Communications  Com-
mission. I welcome this opportunity to appear before you to discuss 
the FCC’s activities regarding the Emergency Alert System. 

For  over  50  years,  the  United  States  has  had  a  mechanism  in 
place to allow the President to communicate with the public in the 
event  of  a  national  emergency.  Currently,  that  mechanism  is  the 
Emergency Alert System, or EAS. 

Under our EAS rules, radio, television, and cable systems are re-
quired  to  deliver  Presidential-level  emergency  messages.  In  addi-
tion,  EAS  has  been  used  on  a  voluntary  basis  for  delivery  of  State 
and local emergency messages. 

Today,  we  face  new  homeland  security  threats  and  challenges, 
and  the  Commission  is  acutely  aware  of  the  importance  to  the 
American public of timely and effective emergency warnings. In ad-
dition,  in  recent  years,  there  have  been  many  important  advance-
ments  in  communications  technologies  that  may  afford  opportuni-
ties for improving EAS. 

As  a  result,  EAS  has  been  the  subject  of  an  extensive  examina-
tion to ensure that we do our part to contribute to an efficient and 
up-to-date  public  alert  and  warning  system.  The  Commission  is 
conducting  a  rulemaking  proceeding  to  consider  whether  EAS  is 
the  most  effective  way  to  warn  the  American  public  of  an  emer-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

gency;  and,  if  not,  how  the  system  can  be  improved.  Because  this 
proceeding  is  ongoing,  my  comments  in  this  hearing  are  limited  to 
the record that has developed so far. 

In its rulemaking proceeding, the Commission raised broad ques-
tions  regarding  whether  EAS’s  capabilities  are  consistent  with  the 
Commission’s  mission  to  ensure  that  the  public  warning  system 
takes full advantage of current and emerging technologies. Specifi-
cally,  the  Commission  sought  comment  on  whether  EAS  should  be 
adapted  or  redesigned  to  take  advantage  of  digital,  satellite,  and 
other wireless technologies. 

What  we’ve  learned  is  that  most  parties  advocate  improving  the 
existing  system  rather  than  completely  redesigning  it.  The  Com-
mission  also  raised  the  issue  of  whether  the  voluntary  nature  of 
EAS  at  the  state  and  local  levels  remains  appropriate  in  today’s 
world. Some of the commentors argue that it should be mandatory; 
others have suggested that voluntary participation by media to de-
liver state and local emergency messages has proven to be effective 
and should be allowed to continue. 

We also asked comment on a number of other issues, such as the 
respective  roles  of  the  Federal  departments  and  agencies  involved 
in  the  implementation  of  EAS,  the  security  of  the  public  warning 
system,  improvements  to  the  testing  of  the  program,  how  a  public 
warning  system  can  most  effectively  provide  emergency  warnings 
to the disabled community and to those for whom English is a sec-
ond language. Indeed, a key focus of our work is how to reach each 
and  every  citizen  with  the  right  emergency-alert  warning  informa-
tion  at  the  right  time.  The  FCC  has,  and  will  continue  to,  coordi-
nate  with  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security,  FEMA,  NOAA, 
and others as we examine these issues. We anticipate that our Fed-
eral  partners  will  continue  to  be  active  participants  in  our  pro-
ceeding,  and  we  also  expect  to  continue  to  receive  valuable  input 
from interested individuals, state and local emergency management 
agencies,  tribal  governments,  and  various  elements  of  the  commu-
nications sector. 

And  we  look  forward  to  working  with  the  Congress,  Federal, 
state,  and  local  emergency  managers,  industry,  and  the  public  to 
ensure  that  we  can  provide  an  effective  warning  system  to  the 
American people. 

I  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  the  opportunity  to  appear.  This 
concludes my testimony. I’d be happy to answer any questions that 
you or the other Members may have. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Moran follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF KENNETH MORAN,  ACTING DIRECTOR,  OFFICE OF 
HOMELAND SECURITY ENFORCEMENT BUREAU,  FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS 
COMMISSION (FCC) 

Executive Summary 

Since the Cold War era, the United States has had a mechanism in place for the 
President of the United States to communicate with the public in the event of a na-
tional  emergency.  Under  the  current  Emergency  Alert  System  (EAS),  all  analog 
broadcast radio, television, and cable systems are required to deliver a Presidential- 
level  activation  of  EAS,  but  their  use  of  EAS  in  response  to  State  and  local  emer-
gencies, while encouraged, is voluntary. 

In  light  of  today’s  homeland  security  threats,  the  Federal  Communications  Com-
mission (Commission) remains acutely aware of the importance of timely and effec-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

tive warnings. In addition, there are exciting changes in our communications media 
that  may  allow  for  improvements  in  our  warning  systems.  As  a  result  of  these 
changes,  EAS  has  recently  been  the  subject  of  much  examination.  To  ensure  that 
the  Commission  does  its  part  to  contribute  to  an  efficient  and  technologically  cur-
rent  public  alert  and  warning  system,  the  Commission  is  conducting  a  rulemaking 
proceeding  to  consider  whether  the  current  EAS  is  the  most  effective  way  to  warn 
the  American  public  of  an  emergency  and,  if  not,  how  the  system  can  be  improved. 
As  part  of  the  current  EAS  proceeding,  the  Commission  raised  broad  questions 
about  whether  the  technical  capabilities  of  EAS  are  consistent  with  the  Commis-
sion’s mission to ensure that public warning systems take full advantage of current 
and emerging technologies, particularly digital broadcast and wireless telecommuni-
cations media. For instance, the Commission noted that some parties argue that the 
purely  voluntary  nature  of  EAS  at  the  state  and  local  level  results  in  an  incon-
sistent  application  of  EAS  as  an  effective  component  of  an  overall  public  alert  and 
warning system. The Commission also is considering issues such as what the respec-
tive roles of the Federal Government departments and agencies involved in the im-
plementation  of  EAS  should  be,  how  the  delivery  pipeline  for  public  warning  can 
be  made  more  secure  and  how  it  can  be  tested,  how  both  emergency  managers  and 
the  public  can  use  and  respond  to  a  public  warning  system  in  the  most  effective 
manner,  and  how  a  public  warning  system  can  most  effectively  provide  emergency 
warnings  to  the  disabled  community  and  those  for  whom  English  is  a  second  lan-
guage.  Indeed,  a  key  focus  of  the  Commission’s  inquiry  is  how  to  reach  each  and 
every citizen. 

The Commission has coordinated closely with the Department of Homeland Secu-
rity  (DHS)  and  its  component,  the  Federal  Emergency  Management  Agency 
(FEMA),  and  with  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA) 
and  its  component,  the  National  Weather  Service  (NWS).  The  Commission  values 
these agencies’ continued participation in our review of EAS. 

The Commission looks forward to working with Congress, our colleagues at other 
Federal, state and tribal agencies, and the public to ensure that it can provide such 
a warning system to our citizens. 
Introduction 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee: 
Good  morning.  I  am  Kenneth  Moran,  Acting  Director  of  the  Federal  Communica-
tions Commission (Commission) Enforcement Bureau’s Office of Homeland Security. 
I welcome this opportunity to appear before you to discuss the Emergency Alert Sys-
tem, or EAS. 

The  Commission  is  well  aware  that  an  effective  public  alert  and  warning  system 
is  an  essential  element  of  emergency  preparedness,  and  that  such  a  system  is  im-
possible  without  effective  communication  and  coordination  within  the  Federal  Gov-
ernment,  as  well  as  with  the  active  participation  of  the  states  and  the  private  sec-
tor.  Accordingly,  the  Commission  has  been  working  with  other  Federal  agencies, 
state  governments,  and  industry  to  ensure  that  the  American  public  is  provided 
with a robust, efficient, and technologically current alert and warning system. 
Background 

The  forerunner  of  our  current  Emergency  Alert  System  originated  in  the  early 
days  of  the  Cold  War  when  President  Truman  established  the  ‘‘CONELRAD  ‘’  sys-
tem  as  a  means  to  warn  the  public  of  an  imminent  attack.  Since  that  time,  CON-
ELRAD  has  given  way  to  the  Emergency  Broadcast  System,  which  in  1994  was  re-
placed  by  EAS.  From  the  early  CONELRAD  days  to  the  present,  the  Commission 
has played a critical role in ensuring that the President of the United States would 
be  able  to  communicate  with  the  American  public  in  the  event  of  a  national  emer-
gency.  Today’s  EAS  uses  analog  radio  and  television  broadcast  stations,  as  well  as 
wired and wireless cable systems, to deliver a national Presidential message. When 
activated,  EAS  would  override  all  other  broadcasts  or  cable  transmissions,  national 
and  local,  to  deliver  an  audio  Presidential  message.  This  system  is  mandatory  at 
the national level, but is also available on a voluntary basis for states and localities 
to deliver local emergency notifications. 

The Commission, in conjunction with the Federal Emergency Management Agency 
(FEMA)  and  the  National  Weather  Service  (NWS),  implements  EAS  at  the  Federal 
level.  Our  respective  roles  currently  are  based  on  a  1981  Memorandum  of  Under-
standing  between  FEMA,  NWS,  and  the  Commission,  on  a  1984  Executive  Order, 
and on a 1995 Presidential Statement of Requirements. 

The  Commission’s  EAS  rules  are  focused  on  national  activation,  and  the  delivery 
of a Presidential message. The Commission’s rules prescribe: (1) technical standards 
for EAS; (2) procedures for radio and television broadcast stations and cable systems 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

to  follow  in  the  event  EAS  is  activated;  and  (3)  EAS  testing  protocols.  Under  the 
rules,  national  activation  of  EAS  for  a  Presidential  message  is  designed  to  provide 
the  President  the  capability  to  transmit  from  any  location  at  any  time  within  10 
minutes of the system’s activation, and would take priority over any other message 
and preempt other messages in progress. Currently, only analog radio and television 
stations, and wired and wireless cable television systems, are required to implement 
the national EAS. Other systems, such as digital television (DTV), Direct Broadcast 
Satellite television (DBS), Low Earth Orbit (LEO) satellite systems, paging, Satellite 
Digital  Audio  Radio  Service  (SDARS),  and  In-Band-On-Channel  Digital  Audio 
Broadcasting (IBOC DAB) are currently not required to participate in EAS. 

The  decision  to  activate  the  national-level  EAS  rests  solely  with  the  President. 
FEMA  acts  as  the  White  House’s  executive  agent  for  the  development,  operations, 
and  maintenance  of  the  national  level  EAS  and  is  responsible  for  implementation 
of the national level activation of EAS, as well as EAS tests and exercises. 

EAS  is  essentially  a  hierarchical  distribution  system.  FEMA  has  designated  34 
radio  broadcast  stations  as  Primary  Entry  Point  (PEP)  stations.  At  the  request  of 
the  President,  FEMA  would  distribute  the  ‘‘Presidential  Level’’  messages  to  these 
PEP stations. The PEP stations are monitored in turn by other stations in the hier-
archical  chain.  Commission  rules  require  broadcast  stations  and  cable  systems  to 
monitor  at  least  two  of  the  EAS  sources  for  Presidential  alerts  that  are  specified 
in  their  state  EAS  plans.  Initiation  of  an  EAS  message,  whether  at  the  national, 
state,  or  local  level,  is  accomplished  via  dedicated  EAS  equipment.  The  EAS  equip-
ment  provides  a  method  for  automatic  interruption  of  regular  programming  and  is 
capable  of  providing  warnings  in  the  primary  language  that  is  used  by  the  station 
or cable system. 

Along with its primary role as a national public warning system, EAS—and other 
emergency notification mechanisms—are part of an overall public alert and warning 
system,  over  which  FEMA  exercises  jurisdiction.  EAS  use,  as  part  of  such  a  public 
warning system at the state and local levels, while encouraged, is voluntary. Never-
theless,  the  public  receives  most  of  its  alert  and  warning  information  through  the 
broadcasters’  and  cable  systems’  voluntary  activations  of  the  EAS  system  on  behalf 
of state and local emergency managers. 
Current Issues and the Commission’s Rulemaking Proceeding 

As noted above, the public relies heavily on EAS for emergency information. EAS 
therefore serves a critical purpose, but it currently only applies to analog radio and 
television stations, and wired and wireless cable television systems. In August 2004, 
the Commission began a rulemaking proceeding to review whether we need to either 
update EAS or replace it with a more comprehensive and effective warning system. 
In  initiating  its  rulemaking,  the  Commission  encouraged  commenters  to  consider 
recommendations  from  two  public/private  partnerships  that  have  studied  EAS 
issues extensively: the Media Security and Reliability Council (MSRC), an industry- 
led  Federal  Advisory  Committee  comprised  of  representatives  from  the  radio,  tele-
vision,  multi-channel  video,  public  safety,  and  disabilities  communities,  and  the 
Partnership  for  Public  Warning  (PPW),  a  not-for-profit,  public/private  partnership 
that  was  incorporated  with  the  goal  of  promoting  and  enhancing  effective,  inte-
grated dissemination of public warnings. 

The  Commission  has  received  comments  from  numerous  interested  individuals, 
Federal entities, State and local emergency planning organizations, and various sec-
tors  of  the  telecommunications  industries.  We  have  coordinated  with  DHS  and  its 
component,  FEMA,  and  with  the  Department  of  Commerce  and  its  component,  the 
National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration’s  (NOAA)  National  Weather 
Service, and we will continue to do so. 

The  overarching  question  addressed  in  the  proceeding  is  whether  EAS  in  its 
present  form  is  the  most  effective  mechanism  for  warning  the  American  public  of 
an emergency, and, if not, how EAS can be improved. Most of the parties who com-
mented agree that our warning system should be improved. Most—including MSRC 
and  PPW—also  advocate  upgrading,  rather  than  replacing  EAS,  to  take  advantage 
of the existing EAS infrastructure. 

The  Commission’s  rulemaking  proceeding  addresses  a  number  of  specific  and 
timely issues. For instance, the Commission noted that some parties argue that the 
purely  voluntary  nature  of  EAS  at  the  state  and  local  level  results  in  an  incon-
sistent  application  of  EAS  as  an  effective  component  of  an  overall  public  alert  and 
warning system. To address these arguments, the Commission is examining wheth-
er  permissive  state  and  local  EAS  participation  remains  appropriate  today,  and 
whether uniform national guidelines should apply to state and local EAS implemen-
tation. Some parties who commented on this issue support continuing voluntary par-
ticipation, at least for the present, while the Commission considers broader changes 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

to  EAS.  Some  parties  also  stated  that  participation,  though  voluntary,  is  wide-
spread. These parties generally support continuing the voluntary nature of EAS 

The  Commission’s  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  (NPRM)  initiating  the  open 
proceeding focused on the fact that EAS is currently mandated only for analog tele-
vision  and  radio,  and  for  cable  systems,  which  represent  an  increasingly  smaller 
part  of  our  information  sources.  The  Commission  is  considering  whether  and  how 
EAS  obligations  should  be  extended  to  services  not  currently  covered—e.g.,  digital 
television  and  radio,  and  satellite  radio  and  television.  Many  commenters  support 
the Commission’s efforts to extend the EAS rules to digital broadcasters. 

The  NPRM  also  asked  questions  about  whether  the  technical  capabilities  of  EAS 
can  or  should  be  applied  to  other  communications  platforms.  Along  with  digital 
broadcast,  new  digital  wireless  technologies,  including  cellular  telephony  and  per-
sonal digital assistants, are rapidly redefining the communications landscape, mak-
ing available to the public warning technologies that are far more flexible and effec-
tive  than  the  analog  broadcast  mechanism  currently  employed  by  EAS.  The  Com-
mission  is  considering  whether  there  should  be  an  effort  to  use  such  technologies 
to  form  a  comprehensive  national  public  warning  system  capable  of  reaching  vir-
tually  everyone  all  the  time  by  combining  EAS  with  alternative  public  alert  and 
warning  systems.  We  received  a  number  of  comments  about  methods,  such  as  cell 
phone  broadcasting,  that  could  expand  the  reach  of  our  warning  systems  in  the  fu-
ture. In their comments, DHS and FEMA also noted that they are investigating new 
technologies for this purpose. 

The Commission also is examining security and reliability issues relevant to EAS 
and on the important question of how best to supply an effective public warning sys-
tem  to  the  disabled  community  and  non-English  speakers.  The  Commission  is  also 
considering  the  role  of  various  Federal  Government  departments  and  agencies,  as 
well as local authorities, in implementing EAS. 

In addition, the Commission is involved in other initiatives, beyond its rulemaking 
proceeding,  to  address  the  effectiveness  of  our  Nation’s  warning  systems.  For  in-
stance,  the  Commission  is  participating  in  the  Task  Force  on  Effective  Warnings 
Materials,  a  group  of  Federal  departments  and  agencies  that  has  been  assembled 
to  examine  existing  and  planned  disaster  warning  and  communications  systems, 
and  to  make  recommendations  to  ensure  that  these  systems  are  effective.  We  will 
continue  to  share  our  expertise  and  views,  and  to  seek  the  expertise  and  views  of 
others, on these important issues. 
Conclusion 

The Commission looks forward to working with Congress, our colleagues at other 
Federal, state, and tribal agencies, and the public to ensure that we can provide an 
effective and technologically advanced warning system to our citizens. The Commis-
sion also is aware that the Congress is taking an active interest in the issue of pub-
lic  alert  and  warning,  and  stands  ready  to  provide  whatever  technical  assistance 
that the Congress would find helpful in this regard. 

Senator DEMINT. Thank you. 
Our  Chairman  has  joined  us.  Mr.  Chairman,  we’re  hearing  from 
FEMA,  the  FCC,  and  getting  ready  to  hear  from  Mr.  Paese,  from 
NOAA.  They  are  giving  us  an  update  on  the  development  of  a  na-
tional all-hazards alert system. 

So,  Mr.  Paese?  Have  I  got  that  name  anywhere  close  to  being 

right? 

Mr. PAESE. Perfect. 
Senator DEMINT. OK. 
STATEMENT OF MARK PAESE, DIRECTOR, MAINTENANCE, 

LOGISTICS AND ACQUISITION DIVISION, NATIONAL 

WEATHER SERVICE, NATIONAL OCEANIC AND 

ATMOSPHERIC ADMINISTRATION (NOAA) 

mittee. 

Mr. PAESE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman and members of the Com-

I am Mark Paese, Director of Maintenance, Logistics, and Acqui-
sition  for  the  National  Weather  Service  at  NOAA.  I  am  pleased  to 
be  here  today  to  discuss  NOAA  Weather  Radio,  All  Hazards. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

Known  as  ‘‘The  Voice  of  the  National  Weather  Service,’’  NOAA 
Weather  Radio,  All  Hazards,  is  provided  as  a  public  service.  The 
NOAA Weather Radio All Hazards Network includes 935 transmit-
ters covering all 50 states, adjacent coastal waters, Puerto Rico, the 
U.S.  Virgin  Islands,  and  U.S.  Pacific  territories.  The  nationwide 
network  of  radio  stations  provides  coverage  to  over  97  percent  of 
the U.S. population. This extensive system of radio transmitters al-
lows the National Weather Service to transmit routine observations 
and forecasts, as well as alerts and warnings of severe weather and 
other hazardous information, 24 hours a day, 7 days a week. 

In  June  2004,  NOAA  and  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security 
signed  an  agreement  providing  DHS  the  capability  to  send  critical 
all-hazards alerts and warnings through the NOAA Weather Radio 
Network.  Now  NOAA  Weather  Radio  broadcasts  warnings  and 
posts  that  information  for  all  types  of  hazards—natural,  such  as 
earthquakes,  tsunamis,  hurricanes,  and  volcanic  activity;  man-
made,  such  as  chemical  releases  or  oil  spills;  and  terrorist  alerts. 
NWS  warnings  are  carefully  developed  to  ensure  critical  informa-
tion is conveyed as directly as possible. Each warning contains sev-
eral  components  that  are  based  on  discussions  with  users,  includ-
ing  the  private  sector,  emergency  managers,  and  the  public.  We 
also work with sociologists and others to ensure the information in 
our  message  is  worded  as  clearly  as  possible  for  the  public  to  un-
derstand what to do. 

While the current network works well, NOAA Weather Radio has 
some  challenges.  We  need  to  ensure  a  fully-functioning  network 
through  continued  maintenance,  upgrading  older  and  solid-state 
transmitters,  installing  backup  power  at  locations  without  this  ca-
pability, and provide the connectivity between alert sources and the 
transmitter.  Existing  dissemination  systems  were  developed  to 
meet  specific  user  requirements  for  information.  Warning  systems 
must  look  toward  the  future  and  include  graphical  forms  of  infor-
mation readily available through advanced technology, such as cell 
phones and PDAs. 

Future  systems  should  also  improve  on  existing  geo-targeting  to 
be  able  to  reach  people  where  they  are—work,  home,  or  on  the 
move—and  reduce  unnecessary  warnings  to  people  who  are  not  in 
hazardous zones. 

Recognizing the need for a national all-hazards alert system, De-
partment  of  Homeland  Security  and  NOAA  serve  as  Co-Chairs  of 
the White House Task Force on Effective Warnings. The effort was 
chartered  by  the  Office  of  Science  Technology  Policy  to  develop  a 
government-wide  plan  for  an  integrated  Public  Alert  and  Warning 
System,  or  IPAWS.  There  will  be  many—there  are  many  warning 
systems  across  the  country,  and  an  integrated  system  of  systems 
will be far better than any one system. 

In  Fiscal  Year  2004,  NOAA  began  developing  a  capability  to  re-
duce the time it takes for an emergency manager to input a hazard 
warning  into  NOAA  Weather  Radio  and  reduce  the  possibility  of 
any  transcription  errors.  This  system,  known  as  HazCollect,  will 
reduce the amount of time it takes to input a message into the sys-
tem  from  7  minutes  to  less  than  2  minutes.  This  capability  is  ex-
pected to be fully operational in Fiscal Year 2006. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

NOAA’s  vision  for  the  future  is  to  ensure  access  and  delivery  of 
environmental warnings, forecasts, and information to every person 
in  the  United  States.  To  achieve  this  vision,  it  is  essential  to  use 
emerging technologies to make warnings and information available 
via convenient methods and formats to as many individuals as pos-
sible. We are working with the private sector to make this happen. 
Government  and  the  emergency  community  must  work  together  to 
develop  an  integrated  Public  Alert  and  Warning  System  adaptable 
to change. 

Standards  and  protocols  such  as  Common  Alerting  Protocol,  or 
CAP, recently agreed upon by the emergency-management commu-
nity,  is  one  example  of  how  the  collaboration  of  the  emergency 
management  community  and  the  government  has  increased  inter-
operability. 

The  Department  of  Homeland  Security,  in  partnership  with 
NOAA  and  the  Department  of  Education,  is  funding  a  pilot  pro-
gram to develop NOAA Weather Radios at public schools in the top 
urban-area security initiatives in two rural states. 

NOAA  Weather  Radio  is  a  proven  technology.  It  works,  and  it 
saves lives. Seven weeks ago, in Endicott, New York, the Principal 
at  Charles  F.  Johnson  Elementary  School  received  a  severe-thun-
derstorm warning on their school NOAA Weather Radio. He imple-
mented his school safety plan and moved the 340 students and fac-
ulty  out  of  harm’s  way.  Twenty  minutes  later,  70-mile-an-hour 
winds ripped the roof off the kindergarten wing and devastated the 
building. 

In  conclusion,  NOAA  Weather  Radio  is  a  proven  dissemination 
network  that  has  saved  lives.  We  will  continue  to  work  with  other 
agencies  to  achieve  the  vision  to  reach  every  person  in  the  United 
States. 

I would be happy to answer any questions. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Paese follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARK PAESE,  DIRECTOR,  MAINTENANCE,  LOGISTICS AND 
ACQUISITION DIVISION,  NATIONAL WEATHER SERVICE,  NATIONAL OCEANIC AND 
ATMOSPHERIC ADMINISTRATION (NOAA) 
Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Committee,  I  am  Mark  Paese,  Director  of 
Maintenance,  Logistics,  and  Acquisition  Services  for  the  National  Weather  Service 
(NWS), of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) within the 
Department of Commerce. I am pleased to be here today to discuss NOAA Weather 
Radio  All  Hazards  (NWR).  I  will  outline  how  our  system  currently  works  and  our 
vision for the future. 
Introduction and Background 

Known as the ‘‘Voice of the National Weather Service,’’ NOAA Weather Radio All 
Hazards  is  provided  as  a  public  service.  The  NOAA  Weather  Radio  All  Hazards 
(NWR)  network  includes  935  transmitters,  covering  all  50  states,  adjacent  coastal 
waters,  Puerto  Rico,  the  U.S.  Virgin  Islands,  and  the  U.S.  Pacific  Territories.  The 
NWR  nationwide  network  of  radio  stations  provides  coverage  to  over  97  percent  of 
the  population.  This  extensive  system  of  radio  transmitters  allows  the  National 
Weather Service to transmit routine programming containing observations and fore-
casts,  with  this  routine  programming  interrupted  to  broadcast  alerts  and  warnings 
of  severe  weather  and  other  hazardous  information  24  hours  a  day.  Each  trans-
mitter  is  automatically  fed  information  from  the  local  NWS  weather  office  typically 
via telephone lines, while some more remote locations use microwave transmissions. 
It  takes  only  seconds  from  when  the  forecaster  hits  the  send  button  until  the  mes-
sage is transmitted on the network. NWR requires a specific radio receiver or scan-
ner,  readily  available  at  most  electronic  stores,  capable  of  receiving  the  broadcast. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

This  NWS  direct  broadcast  includes  special  codes  identifying  alerts  and  warnings, 
with many receivers equipped to monitor these codes. 

15 

NWR receivers should be as common as smoke detectors especially given their ca-
pability to wake people in the middle of the night when hazardous conditions threat-
en. In addition to the traditional weather radio that many are familiar with, NOAA 
Weather  Radio  All  Hazards  receivers  can  be  integrated  into  devices  to  turn  on 
alarms,  lights,  bed  shakers,  and  other  equipment  especially  useful  for  the  hearing 
impaired community and those with special needs. 

Agreements with local, State, and Federal emergency managers and first respond-
ers,  and  working  with  the  Federal  Communications  Commission’s  (FCC’s)  Emer-
gency Alert System, allow NWR to act as a direct, official source for comprehensive 
weather  and  emergency  information—an  ‘‘all  hazards’’  warning  system.  In  June 
2004, NOAA and the Department of Homeland Security signed an agreement allow-
ing DHS to send critical all-hazards alerts and warnings directly through the NOAA 
Weather  Radio  All  Hazards  network,  further  leveraging  NWR  as  a  backbone  of  a 
national  emergency  alert  and  warning  system.  With  this  agreement  in  place,  NWR 
is  the  only  Federal  Government  warning  system  that  can  be  targeted  to  specific 
areas  to  deliver  a  message  from  the  President.  NOAA  Weather  Radio  All  Hazards 
also  broadcasts  warning  and  post-event  information  for  all  types  of  hazards—both 
natural, such as earthquakes, tsunamis, hurricanes, and volcanic activity, and man 
made, such as chemical releases or oil spills. Many emergency dispatch centers, in-
stitutional (day care, elder care, hospitals, schools, etc), building and manufacturing 
security  operations  centers  monitor  NWR  for  emergency  warning  information  as  a 
public safety tool. 

NWS  warnings  are  carefully  developed  to  ensure  critical  information  is  conveyed 
as  directly  as  possible,  regardless  of  the  transmission  on  NWR  or  any  of  the  other 
dissemination  systems.  Each  warning  contains  several  components,  which  are  in-
cluded  based  on  NWS  discussions  with  users,  including  private  sector,  emergency 
managers,  and  the  public.  We  also  worked  with  sociologists  and  others  to  ensure 
the  information  in  our  messages  is  worded  as  clearly  as  possible  for  the  public  to 
understand  what  to  do.  The  messages  include  appropriate  ‘‘call  to  action’’  state-
ments  advising  people  of  actions  to  take  (seek  shelter  indoors,  avoid  crossing  high 
water, etc.). The messages also contain critical event and geographic information for 
other  dissemination  and  computer  systems  to  decode  and  retransmit.  For  example, 
the Emergency Alert System (EAS) operated under FCC rules is automatically acti-
vated by NWR broadcasts of warnings. 
Upcoming Challenges for NOAA Weather Radio All Hazards 

While our current network works well, NWR has some challenges. We need to en-
sure  a  fully  functioning  network  through  continued  maintenance,  upgrading  older 
solid  state  transmitters,  public  education  and  awareness  about  the  capabilities  of 
the  network,  installing  backup  power  at  locations  without  this  capability  to  ensure 
continued  service  when  commercial  power  fails,  and  upgrading  the  telecommuni-
cation feed from the NWS office to the transmitter. 

The  number  of  NWR  transmitters  has  more  than  doubled  in  the  past  decade. 
Today, 935 transmitters are in operation, with three more scheduled to come on line 
by  the  end  of  the  September.  NWR  intends  to  upgrade  older  transmitters  to  new 
technology  standards.  These  upgrades  to  400  transmitters  will  be  completed  by  FY 
2011. We will be increasing coverage to 100 percent for areas of the Nation particu-
larly  vulnerable  to  severe  weather  and  tornadoes,  such  as  tornado  alley.  Current 
projections call for meeting this goal in 2007. We also plan to provide backup power 
to all NWR stations by 2012, which includes about 440 currently without that capa-
bility.  We  have  a  plan  to  provide  a  more  reliable  and  robust  communication  feed 
directly  to  the  transmitters.  Converting  to  this  new  process  should  be  complete  in 
FY 2009. 
Next Generation Warning System 

Existing dissemination systems were developed to meet user requirements for in-
formation.  Any  future  warning  system  must  go  beyond  direct  radio  broadcasts  and 
include  visual  forms  of  information  readily  available  through  advancing  technology 
(e.g.,  cell  phones,  Personal  Digital  Assistants,  etc).  Future  systems  should  also  im-
prove  on  existing  geo-targeting/referencing  to  be  able  to  reach  people  where  they 
are—home,  work,  or  on  the  move—and  to  reduce  warnings  to  people  who  are  not 
in the hazardous zones. 

Hazardous weather and water forecasts, warnings, and other hazards information 
are  delivered  as  quickly  as  possible  using  ‘‘push’’  and  ‘‘pull’’  dissemination  tech-
nologies, which respectively send information and allow information to be retrieved. 
‘‘Push’’ occurs when messages and information are broadcast or sent to the recipient 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

(e.g.  a  radio  is  push  technology).  ‘‘Pull’’  technology  includes  mechanisms  in  which 
information is transmitted in response to a request from a user (e.g., using Internet 
browsers to request information). 

Push  (send)  capabilities  distribute  scheduled  and  unscheduled  warnings,  fore-
casts, and information using a predetermined priority. Warnings are given the high-
est priority. For example, NOAA Weather Radio All Hazards is a ‘‘push’’ technology; 
it provides 24-hour access to weather information and other all-hazards information. 
NWR  is  one  component  of  the  existing  NWS  dissemination  infrastructure,  which 
also includes NOAA Weather Wire Service, Emergency Managers Weather Informa-
tion  Network  or  EMWIN,  Family  of  Services,  and  NOAAPort.  Pull  (retrieve)  capa-
bilities make warnings, forecasts, and information available for people to acquire as 
needed.  The  Internet  is  our  primary  use  of  a  ‘‘pull’’  technology;  it  enables  users  to 
retrieve  environmental  information  as  needed  from  NOAA  web  pages  and  other  lo-
cations. 

Recognizing  the  rapid  advances  in  information  technologies,  the  Department  of 
Homeland Security and NOAA co-chair an effort to develop a government-wide plan 
for  the  Integrated  Public  Alert  and  Warning  System  (IPAWS).  The  government’s 
ability  to  effectively  warn  the  public  of  danger  will  be  greatly  improved  by  imple-
menting IPAWS. Public safety is a fundamental responsibility of Federal, state and 
local  governments.  Public  warnings  save  lives  by  informing,  reducing  fear,  recom-
mending  action,  and  assisting  emergency  managers.  The  Administration  is  formu-
lating  an  overall  plan  for  emergency  broadcasts  and  warning  systems.  There  are 
many warning systems in place across the country, ranging from local phone warn-
ing  capability,  local  sirens,  paging  systems,  Internet  notification,  to  national  level- 
warning  programs,  including  the  NOAA  Weather  Radio  All  Hazards.  Each  of  these 
systems  by  themselves  can  reach  the  public  directly,  but  each  has  limitations.  An 
integrated system employing all of these capabilities will be far better than any sin-
gle system. 

In  FY  2004,  NOAA  began  developing  a  capability  to  reduce  the  time  it  takes  for 
an  emergency  manager  to  input  a  hazard  warning  into  NOAA  Weather  Radio  All 
Hazards  and  reduce  the  possibility  of  transcription  errors.  This  system,  known  as 
HazCollect, will reduce the amount of time it takes to input a message into the sys-
tem—from  7  minutes  to  less  than  2  minutes.  This  capability  will  allow  emergency 
managers direct access to Emergency Alert System (EAS) via NOAA Weather Radio 
All Hazards, and is expected to be fully operational in FY 2006. 
A Vision for the Future 

Our  Vision—Reach  each  person  in  the  Nation.  NOAA’s  vision  is  to  ensure  access 
and  delivery  of  environmental  warnings,  forecasts,  and  information  to  every  person 
in  the  United  States.  This  dissemination  system  should  provide  climate,  water, 
weather  and  other  hazard  information  the  public  wants,  when  they  want  it,  where 
they  want  it,  how  they  want  it,  and  should  ensure  persons  at  risk  receive  timely 
alerts. Warnings do not become effective until those in harm’s way hear the warning 
and  take  appropriate  action.  Advanced,  universally  accessible  dissemination  tech-
nologies are necessary to deliver environmental information for the protection of life 
and  property.  Universal  access  depends  upon  partnerships  within  communities  to 
increase awareness and coverage. 

To achieve this vision, it is essential to use emerging technologies to improve com-
munication performance measured by operational availability, latency, cost effective-
ness,  and  most  importantly,  customer  satisfaction.  We  need  to  make  warnings  and 
information available, via convenient methods and formats (e.g., industry standards 
such  as  GIS,  XML  and  Real  Simple  Syndication  (RSS)),  to  as  many  individuals  as 
possible. We are working now to make this happen. 

The  emergency  information  community  and  the  government  must  work  together 
to develop a dissemination program that is integrated and adaptable to change. The 
Common  Alerting  Protocol  (CAP),  recently  agreed  upon  by  the  emergency  manage-
ment community, is one example of how the collaboration of the emergency manage-
ment community and the government has increased the effectiveness of the alerting 
system. HazCollect will use the CAP format for emergency messages. 

To  be  most  effective,  emergency  information  must  penetrate  all  technologies— 
radio,  TV,  satellite  radio,  satellite  TV,  fixed  telephony,  mobile  telephony  and  the 
Internet,  including  voice  over  Internet  provider  (VOIP),  in  addition  to  system-spe-
cific receivers like NWR—and recognize the limitations of each. No single technology 
or  system  will  reach  all  end-users.  The  most  critical  information  must  be  ‘‘pushed’’ 
to the end users. 

We  must  account  for  a  broad  spectrum  of  users,  from  those  who  want  simple  ac-
cess  to  basic  information  to  those  who  want  customized  access  in  order  to  extract 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

information  to  meet  their  needs  and,  finally,  those  who  want  to  download  data  in 
bulk. 

Current  and  future  technologies  must  be  leveraged  to  combine  common  functions 
into  a  streamlined  dissemination  process.  Because  many  push  systems  share  com-
mon  features,  current  and  future  technology  advances  will  facilitate  merging  the 
functionality  of  the  various  systems  while  fulfilling  their  individual  requirements. 
A properly planned network will yield reliable, and cost effective services. 

The  NWS  depends  on  close  working  relationships  with  media  and  vendor  groups 
to  disseminate  NWS  information,  especially  warnings  and  forecasts,  and  must  con-
sider  the  essential  role  of  its  partners  in  dissemination.  We  will  work  more  closely 
with  industry  leaders  so  NWS  will  be  able  to  reach  the  public  through  such  target 
technologies  as  satellite  radio,  satellite  television,  cable  television,  broadcast  tele-
vision, mobile/cellular telephony, fixed telephony (land lines), commercial radio, and 
the Internet (including VOIP). 

Flexibility must be ‘‘built in’’ to formats, standards and protocols used to dissemi-
nate  information.  NWS  and  the  entire  all-hazards  community  should  adopt  policies 
to  put  themselves  in  a  position  to  efficiently  modify  the  formats  and  protocols  used 
for  dissemination  as  industry  standards  evolve  and  as  new  technologies  become 
available. For example, the Internet text format known as Extensible Markup Lan-
guage  (XML)  is  necessary  to  support  more  sophisticated  and  automated  data  dis-
covery,  selection  and  retrieval  mechanisms.  XML  is  a  simple,  very  flexible  text  for-
mat  originally  designed  to  meet  the  challenges  of  large-scale  electronic  publishing. 
XML  is  also  playing  an  increasingly  important  role  in  the  exchange  of  a  wide  vari-
ety  of  data  on  the  Internet  and  elsewhere.  NWS  will  also  need  to  respond  to  the 
growing popularity of GIS formats. 

We  need  to  improve  performance  to  keep  pace  with  the  need  for  more  data  and 
information  in  various  formats  by  maintaining  adequate  processing  speed,  appro-
priate  latency,  and  cost  effectiveness.  As  science  and  technology  continue  to  ad-
vance,  more  data  sets,  and  more  information  will  become  available.  Data  compres-
sion techniques will allow more information to be transmitted by fully exploiting the 
communications infrastructure. 

Finally,  we  need  to  investigate  emerging  technologies  to  fulfill  dissemination  re-
quirements  beyond  the  next  few  years.  Technologies  such  as  software-defined  radio 
(SDR)/cognitive radio would allow the user more precision and flexibility in deciding 
which  information  to  hear.  Cognitive  radio  knows  where  it  is,  what  services  are 
available, and what services interest the user. WiFi (wireless fidelity) and voice over 
wireless  LAN  (VoWLAN)  provide  an  expanded  opportunity  to  reach  a  more  mobile 
public. 
Conclusion 

NOAA  Weather  Radio  All  Hazards  is  a  proven  dissemination  network  that  has 
saved  lives.  We  will  continue  to  exploit  our  existing  technology.  However,  techno-
logical  advances  will  continue  to  drive  how  we  can  best  communicate  critical  infor-
mation  to  an  ever  more  mobile  and  technology  equipped  public.  It  is  our  responsi-
bility to ensure critical emergency information is available and can reach the people 
as  easily  and  conveniently  as  possible.  We  will  continue  to  work  to  achieve  our  vi-
sion to reach every person in our great Nation. 

Senator DEMINT. Thank you. 
Mr. Chairman, would you like to make a statement? 
STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The CHAIRMAN. Well, thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
I’ve come over to really put in the record the fact that, at my re-
quest,  we’ve  put  $10  million  in  the  budget  now,  for  2  years,  and 
there’s $5 million in the bills that are pending now, to pursue this 
effort.  I  hope  that  it  will—I  think  that  money  also  includes  a  pilot 
project on using the NOAA Weather Radios, and they’re being tried 
out in the offshore states, I believe. But I do hope that we can find 
a way to really bring about the total coordination that you’ve men-
tioned. 

And  my  basic  question  is,  Is  this  money  enough?  Are  we  going 
to  be  able  to  get  this  job  done  with  the  money  we’ve  got  now  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

appropriated  in  the  past?  Who  wants  to  answer  that?  It  went  to 
Homeland Security, so why don’t the Homeland Security people an-
swer? 

Mr. HOOVER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
You  are  correct,  in  the  Fiscal  Year  2004  and  2005  budgets,  the 
Congress appropriated $10 million in each year to the Department 
of  Homeland  Security.  Those  funds  went  to  IAIP,  the  Information 
Analysis and Infrastructure Protection directorate. We have coordi-
nated  with  IAIP  over  the  last  2  years,  the  last  two  fiscal  years, 
and,  in  fact,  have  coordinated  our  efforts  with  regard  to  the  alert 
and warning upgrades. 

As  part  of  the  funding  that  you’ve  mentioned,  we  have  provided 
funds  for  the  upgrade  of  the  NOAA  All–Hazards  Radio  Network. 
We  have  provided  funds  for  providing  radios,  NOAA  Weather  Ra-
dios,  to  schools,  as  Mark  had  just  previously  testified  to.  And  the 
monies  that  we  are  using  is  really—the  10  million  this  year  and 
last  year—are  funds  that  are  for  that  IPAWS  initiative,  that,  both 
within  the  Department,  we’re  coordinated  on,  and,  as  well,  across 
the government, that we’re coordinated on to move forward to bring 
the next-generation alert and warning system into being. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  At  a  recent  meeting  I  attended,  I  was  told  that 
the—really,  the  key  to  this  effort  is  software.  Are  you  developing 
software  so  there  will  be,  really,  a  continuity  throughout  all  sys-
tems using the same software? 

Mr. HOOVER. There is some software development that’s going on 
in  the  background,  and  I  am  not  that  technical  to  be  able  to  tell 
you all the software pieces of it. And the key, I think, is—as you’re 
alluding  to—is  the  integration  piece.  The  technology’s  out  there. 
And  I  think  today,  in  the  next  panel,  you’ll  see  a  demonstration 
from—what  we’re  doing  with  the  digital  emergency  alert  system. 
The  technology  is  there.  The  challenge  is  the  integration  of  all  of 
those  systems  so  that  we  can  reach  all  of  the  American  public  at 
the right time with the right information. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  I’m  sorry,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  have  to  go  to 

another meeting. 

But  I  don’t  think  you  quite  answered  my  question  about  money. 
Is  that  five  million  going  to  be  sufficient  to  complete  this  initial 
phase of this integration? 

Mr.  HOOVER.  We  believe  that—if  that’s  in  the—if  the  Congress 
is going to give us $5 million, Mr. Chairman, that will be sufficient 
for us to continue to move forward with the IPAWS program. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  What  is  your  time  frame?  What  is  the  target 

date for initiating the system? 

Mr. HOOVER. Mr. Chairman, we’re actually in the process now of 
rolling  out  a  second  phase  of  the  digital  pilot  that  we’re  working 
with,  APTS,  to  demonstrate  a  nationwide  capability  for  distribu-
tion,  to  identify  some  additional  technological  issues  that  are  out 
there,  and  then  develop  a  nationwide  implementation  plan.  And 
we’re moving forward with that right now. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  You  still  haven’t  answered  me.  What—do  you 

have a target date? 

Mr.  HOOVER.  I  can’t  give  you  a  target  date,  Mr.  Chairman,  in 
terms of when the system actually will be in place and operational. 
I  can  tell  you  that,  as  we  move  forward—and  I  would  expect,  by 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

the  end  of  next  fiscal  year,  we  would  be  in  a  position  to  have  the 
basics  of  the  backbone  system  in  place  so  that  we  can  move  for-
ward to have a full implementation. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Maybe  time-sensitive  about  that.  Do  you  know, 
my  state  has  more  natural  disasters  than  any  part  of  the  United 
States?  Hawaii  comes  second.  Now,  the  two  of  us  from  the  Pacific 
are  very  concerned  about  this,  and  we  think  there  ought  to  be  a 
date when people can understand this system will be in place. 

Mr. HOOVER. Well—— 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Now,  when  will  you  be  able  to  answer  the  ques-

tion of, When will the system be in place and operable? 

Mr.  HOOVER.  Well,  Mr.  Chairman,  it’s  important  to  recognize 
that there already is a system in place to warn the public for emer-
gencies,  and  that  is  the  Emergency  Alert  System,  and  it  is  used 
every  day.  What  we’re  doing  now  is  taking  that  one  step  further 
and  implementing—using  new  digital  technologies  to  be  able  to 
reach out to more people, more of the time. 

The CHAIRMAN. That relies on—— 
Mr. HOOVER. So, we do have a system in place. 
The CHAIRMAN.—just on radio, doesn’t it? 
Mr. HOOVER. Yes, sir. I mean, the foundation of the EAS system 

is based on the broadcasters and the broadcasters’ participation. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  That  was  a  wonderful  system  for  its  time,  but  I 
don’t  know  many  people  that  carry  around  radios  in  their  pocket 
any  longer.  They’re  carrying  cell  phones,  they’ve  carrying  Black-
Berrys, they’re carrying all sorts of devices for communication, and 
we  need  to  get  in  touch  with  the  future  on  this  system.  When  is 
that integration date? 

Mr. HOOVER. Mr. Chairman, I can’t give you an exact date. I can 
tell you that by the end of next year we will be well along the way 
to fully deploying an Integrated Public Alert and Warning System. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  OK.  Then,  Mr.  Chairman,  you  can  tune  in  the 
same  station  next  year,  I’ll  ask  you  the  same  question  next  year. 

Mr. HOOVER. Thank you, sir. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator DEMINT. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
As  you  probably  understand,  we  might  need  to  come  up  with  a 

date at—— 

Mr. HOOVER. Yes, sir. 
Senator DEMINT.—this point. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator DEMINT. And, Mr. Hoover, my respect—— 
Mr. HOOVER. Got that loud and clear, Mr. Chairman. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  DEMINT.  Good,  I’m  glad  we—we’re  understanding  the 

same message here. 

Mr.  Hoover,  my  respect  for  you  has  gone  way  up.  I’ve  never 
heard anyone in a Federal agency say they have enough money, so 
I appreciate—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator DEMINT.—us starting that way. 
Let  me  start  with  a  couple  of  questions,  and  then  I’ll  ask  the 

Ranking Member to help me here. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

And  I’ll  start  with  you,  Mr.  Hoover.  You  mentioned  IPAW.  And 
I  know  it’s  the  process  of  identifying  the  technical  challenges  to 
what  we  want  to  accomplish.  What  are  some  of  those  technical 
challenges that we’re facing? And how can we address them? 

Mr. HOOVER. Thank you for that, Mr. Chairman. 
It’s  important  to  realize  that,  as  we’ve  tried  to  put  this  system 
in  place,  we’ve  focused,  really,  on  the  method  of  distribution,  and 
we  haven’t  looked  at  what  the  message  is  and—because  we  want 
to  make  sure  that  we  have  those  technological  challenges,  we  un-
derstand what they are, so that as we transmit an emergency mes-
sage  to  a  cell  phone  provider,  for  example,  they  don’t  have  to  do 
anything to the message, and it can go right straight through their 
system.  So,  one  of  the  technological  challenges  that  we’re  working 
with—and I would say there are two of them—the first one is what 
I  would  call  that  middleware.  There  needs  to  be  some  type  of  a 
software application that will allow us to send a message to, for ex-
ample, the cell phone carriers or the satellite radio providers, some 
software  that  will  allow  the  message  to  go  right  from  an  author-
ized, authenticated originator of a message into their system with-
out the provider having to manipulate the message and then go out 
to  their  service  customers.  So,  that’s  the  first  challenge,  is  trying 
to develop that, sort of, middleware piece, and we have—— 

Senator DEMINT. Are you working with the private companies on 
doing—my  concern  is,  I  think,  too  often  in  government  we’ll  de-
velop our own ideas of what should be done, and then tell the car-
riers, ‘‘Here, use this.’’ 
Mr. HOOVER. Right. 
Senator  DEMINT.  And  they  may  have  to  spend  incredible 
amounts of money to adapt to what we’ve developed. And it would 
seem  a  much  better  approach  that  if  we  find  out  from  them  how 
they  need  this  information,  so  that  they  can  pass  it  straight 
through—and you’re telling me, that is—— 

Mr. HOOVER. We’re doing that. 
Senator DEMINT.—your approach. 
Mr.  HOOVER.  And,  actually,  we  are  doing  that,  and  we’re  doing 
that  with  all  the  participants  in  our  digital  pilot  that  we’re  doing 
here  with  the—in  the  national  capital  region,  and  we’re  getting 
ready to move out into phase two. 

All  of  the  folks  that  are  at  the  table  with  us,  through  voluntary 
participation—the  cell  phone  folks,  the  satellite  radio  folks,  com-
mercial  broadcasters,  all  the  different  people  involved,  even  the 
technological—the technology development folks—are involved with 
us,  and  we  have  put  together  a  group  to  address  those  techno-
logical issues that really are going to make the system work. 

Senator  DEMINT.  So,  your  perspective  may  be  that  the  Federal 
agencies,  working  together,  may  actually  create  different  methods 
of  distribution  in  order  to  work  with  all  of  your  customers,  which, 
in effect, are the various carriers, cell phone, whatever, that—— 

Mr. HOOVER. Yes, sir. 
Senator DEMINT.—you’re going to try to adapt to them. 
Mr. HOOVER. Yes, sir. And the key to it is that Common Alerting 
Protocol  that  we’ve  adopted  and  we’ve  been  using  in  our  pilot  pro-
grams,  so  that  the  message  is  in  a  digital  format.  It’s  a  packet  of 
ones and zeros, basically. It doesn’t matter what the message is. If 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

we  can  keep  it  in  a  Common  Alerting  Protocol  format,  any  type  of 
a  receiver  device  that’s  in  the  digital  age  should  be  able  to  take 
that message and send it out. 

Senator DEMINT. Just—and this question could be to any of you. 
Going through the process of setting this whole system up is, obvi-
ously, our responsibility. But a part of that is trying to understand 
how  people  will  respond.  And,  in  many  cases,  we  may  spend  a  lot 
of  time  and  money  doing  something  where  people  will  not  nec-
essarily respond in a constructive way. But is that part of this con-
sideration?  And  I  know  we’ve  maybe  observed,  through  weather 
alerts  or  whatever,  how  many  people  actually  will  do  anything 
about  it.  Are  we  into  the  behavior  of  our  final  customer,  here,  the 
citizen, and how they might behave when they get an alert? 

Mr.  HOOVER.  Sir,  let  me  start  with  that,  and  then  maybe  Mark 
can finish up, because I know they’ve done a lot of work in the so-
cial-behavior piece. 

As I mentioned, our focus has been on the technology, at the mo-
ment,  and  we  haven’t  so  much  focused  on  the  message.  But  that 
will  be  the  next  piece  of  it,  as  we  move  forward,  is  to  figure  out, 
OK,  what  are  those  messages  that  we  want  to  send  so  that  we  do 
give  people  the  right  information  that  can  save  lives?  And  I  know 
that NOAA has done a significant amount of research in social be-
havior in that area. 

Mr. PAESE. Yes, thank you, Reynold. 
Yes,  as  Reynold  mentioned,  we  believe  that  setting  the  architec-
ture and the protocols and the infrastructure, I think, are our first 
stage  to  get  the  architecture  set  up,  and  learning  from  the  lessons 
that  NOAA  has  and  with  the  behavioral  scientists  that  we’ve  spo-
ken  to  on—when  a  message  goes  out,  what  actions  to  take  and 
what  message  to  provide  them.  We’re  going  to  use  that  as  a  basis, 
then, to continue on. 

Senator DEMINT. Senator Nelson? 
Senator BEN NELSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Well, as you have seen, Chairman Stevens is quite subtle. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  BEN NELSON.  I  want  to  examine  your  approach  to  deal-
ing with how you bring together architecture and differentiation of 
message  in  the  ordinary  course  of  things,  where  you  have  to  start 
out  with  the  ability  to  notify  and  then  you  have  to  decide  what  it 
is that you want to say and, of course, ultimately, the audience for 
the message. But this is probably very time sensitive because of the 
terrorist threats that are represented today. 

Therefore, I think people will feel more secure if there’s notifica-
tion. They’d feel most secure if they don’t think there’s going to be 
a  terrorist  activity.  On  the  other  hand,  I  think  people  are  wise 
enough  to  know  that  zero  tolerance  may  be  our  goal,  but  it’s  hard 
to  achieve.  So,  the  second  best  is  to  have  some  degree  of  notifica-
tion,  because  of  what  that  would  represent  in  their  preparedness. 
As you’re doing this, with the technology, the hardware, and the 
software, are you going to be in a position, ultimately, to where the 
use of the technology would permit you to alert people, through the 
BlackBerry  or  through  the  cell  phone,  of  a  tornado  in  a  certain 
area?  Also,  I  assume  that  you’re  probably  looking  at  area  codes. 
There may be some other technology that you use that would iden-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

tify  it.  Are  you  going  to  be  able,  at  some  point,  to  be  that  specific 
in your alerting system? As you choose. 

Mr. HOOVER. Yes, Senator. In fact, one of the parts of the IPAWS 
is  a  partnership  we’re  doing  with  NOAA  for  GTAS,  the  Geo-Tar-
geted  Alert  and  Warning  System,  where  we’ll  actually  be  able  to 
use  the  reverse-911  database  to  provide  targeted  warnings  to  pre-
cise groups of people, based on the 911 database and other systems 
that  NOAA  has  in  place,  to  give  them  warning,  to  say,  ‘‘There’s  a 
tornado coming,’’ and, ‘‘Head in a different direction,’’ or some spe-
cific  message  and  instruction.  So,  we  are  doing  that.  And  I  think 
in  the  next  panel  you’ll  see  a  demonstration  where  we’re  able  to 
use an alert and warning message and generate it through a num-
ber of different devices, including the BlackBerry and other devices 
that are out there. 

Senator BEN NELSON. Mr. Paese? 
Mr. PAESE. Yes, if I may. Yes, we believe that is the wave of the 
future.  Obviously,  FIPS  codes,  the  way  we  alert  and  warn  people 
today by county and—it can be broken up into a ninth of a county. 
But GIS, we believe, is the future. If a person in a location can get 
a  message,  a  signal,  if  you  will,  on  their  BlackBerry,  on  their  cell 
phone, on their device, that, we believe, is the way to geo-target in-
dividuals.  And  the  technology  is  there  today.  We  feel  that  inte-
grating  that  technology  into  the  front  end  of  the  message  to  get  it 
to those individuals is the key, and we feel that is the future. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Well,  as  you  proceed,  I  think  the  question 
is, how quickly can you achieve that, and what sort of timeline can 
you  put  in  place  so  that  your  progress  can  be  measured,  not  only 
by  yourselves,  but  by  others  from  the  outside?  I  think  that’s  the 
frustration  you’re  sensing.  When  we  don’t  know  whether  you’re  50 
percent toward your objective, or 35, or 5 percent toward it, it’s dif-
ficult for us to provide the kind of oversight that we think we need 
to provide. 

In  that  regard,  because  there’s  more  to  this,  at  times,  than  the 
technology  and  the  differentiation,  Mr.  Moran,  how  do  you  expect 
the FCC to proceed in the rulemaking that is probably going to be 
necessary? Because we’re talking about some of the basic nuts and 
bolts, as well as the technology and the program itself. 

Mr. MORAN. Yes, Senator. 
We  have—last  summer,  we  opened  a  proceeding  on  improving 
the  alert  and  warning  systems,  and  we  got  an  extensive—we  have 
an extensive written record from that proceeding. We asked a num-
ber  of  questions,  many  of  them  you’ve  actually—you  and  the— 
Chairman  DeMint  have  touched  on.  We’ve  asked  many  of  those 
questions  in  our  proceeding.  We  got  an—we  have  an  extensive 
record,  and  we’ve  been  in—recently,  we’ve  been  in  touch—we’ve 
had  a  series  of  meetings  with  all  the  major  media  players  to  try 
to  figure  out  how  we  can  improve  the  EAS  system  and  what  addi-
tional augmentation to the processes, to the alert and warning sys-
tems, may be necessary. 

So,  we  have  quite  an  extensive  record.  We  expect  to  be  able  to 
deliver, perhaps, an initial order that would make some initial im-
provements to the EAS system in the next several months. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Could  you  narrow  that  down  just  a  little 

bit? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

Mr. MORAN. We expect to be able to bring something for Commis-
sion  decision  in  the  next  several  months  on  some  basic  issues  of 
participation  in  the  EAS  program  by  digital  broadcasters,  by  sat-
ellite,  direct-to-home  TV  and  radio  broadcasters—or  service  pro-
viders. 

Our  approach  is  to  set  some  basic  goals  and  obligations  that 
would—missions,  goals  that  we  would  try  to  meet,  and  to  allow 
some  flexibility  so  that  the  cost  to  the  providers  would  not  be  that 
much to implement what is desired. 

So,  we  do  intend  to  have  some  flexibility  to  make  sure  that  the 
basic  goal,  that  all  American  citizens  would  have  access  to  an  ex-
cellent emergency warning system—that’s the goal. We would allow 
some flexibility, if that’s what it takes to make it happen, with the 
infrastructure that’s out there. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  A  short  question  to  follow  up  on  that  is, 
will  the  rulemaking  proceed  at  an  appropriate  pace  to  make  sure 
that  we  don’t  get  to  the  end  of  the  line  with  the  technology  all 
ready  to  go  and  we’ve  got  several  months  waiting  for  the  rule-
making to be complete? 

Mr. HOOVER. Maybe I can take that one, Senator. We—part and 
parcel with the FCC’s rulemaking initiative, as NOAA had pointed 
out—Mark  mentioned  in  his  testimony—we  co-chair  a  Task  Force 
on Effective Warning that has all the major players in the Federal 
Government  involved  in  alert  and  warning.  Our  objective  there  is 
to  develop  a  national  policy  that  will  lay  out  the  architecture  for 
a national alert and warning system. And we hope that that policy 
will  fit  part  and  parcel  with  the  FCC’s  rulemaking.  And  I  think 
we’re working to try to get that done, as a—— 

Senator BEN NELSON. So, we could—— 
Mr. HOOVER.—on a very timely basis. 
Senator BEN NELSON.—we could reach closure on the actual sys-
tem  and  the  authority  that  is  there,  any  authority  that’s  required, 
and  not  be  held  up  by  even  pending  legislation  that  might  become 
necessary. 

Mr. HOOVER. That’s correct. We’re trying to marry up a national 
policy  for  alert  and  warning  that  we  think  will  include—and  we’re 
pretty confident will include—this IPAWS solution that we’re talk-
ing  about  today,  and  marry  that  up  with  the  rulemaking  so  that 
the  policy  will  help  the  rulemaking,  as  opposed  to  the  rulemaking 
driving the policy or being hindered by anything else. 

Senator BEN NELSON. Well, I think that’s excellent. And it needs 
to  work  that  way,  or  I  don’t  think  you’ll  want  to  attend  the  next 
hearing when the Chairman is here. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator BEN NELSON. Thank you very much. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr. HOOVER. Thank you, sir. 
Senator  DEMINT.  I’m,  kind  of,  sitting  here  wondering  why  we’re 
working  on  legislation  if  you’re  doing  the  policy  and  rulemaking 
here. So, you’re initiating this without legislation. Is—— 

Mr. HOOVER. Yes, sir. One of the things that—we’ve started this 

about a year and a half, almost 2 years, ago. 

Senator DEMINT. Yes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

Mr.  HOOVER.  And  we  started  with  this  IPAWS  solution,  when 
APTS,  Public  Television  folks,  came  to  us  and  said,  ‘‘We  want  to 
be a partner with Homeland Security in providing alert and warn-
ing messaging.’’ At the same time, the FCC had their Media Secu-
rity  and  Reliability  Council  that  came  and  made  recommendations 
on  improvements  to  the  EAS.  At  the  same  time  that  that  hit,  the 
Partnership for Public Warning produced a report that had a num-
ber  of  recommendations  in  there.  We  think  we’re  implementing 
most  of  those  recommendations.  And  we  started  moving  down  the 
road to developing this IPAWS solution, and what we realized is— 
between  us  and  NOAA,  that  we  need  the  policy  that  will  show  us 
what the architecture is, at the end of the day, because we can put 
all these things together—the technology is there; it’s that integra-
tion  piece.  And  so,  the  White  House  stood  up  this  Task  Force  on 
Effective  Warning,  just  in  the  last  2  or  3  months,  and  we’re  on  a 
pretty  fast  track  to  try  to  deliver  a  policy  so  that  it  lays  out  what 
does that end state look like for a next-generation alert and warn-
ing  system.  And  we’re  working  very  closely  with  the  FCC  so  that 
all of those things happen together. 

Senator  DEMINT.  So,  if  we  don’t  develop  legislative  guidelines, 

you’re going to do it anyway, right? 

Mr. HOOVER. Yes, sir. 
Senator  DEMINT.  OK.  I  guess  that’s  a  good  challenge  to  have 

here. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator DEMINT. Mr. Moran, let me ask you a question, because 
I’m  very  concerned  about  us  developing  something  that—issuing 
mandates  to  the  private  market  that  could  cause  considerable  cost 
and maybe not necessarily take advantage of evolving technologies. 
You  mentioned  some  flexibility.  You  know,  my  hope  would  be 
that—and  I  would  like  your  opinion  on  this;  maybe  I  should  state 
it  that  way—is,  if  we  make  the  messaging,  the  distribution  avail-
able  in  a  lot  of  different  formats  that  can  be  accepted  by  a  vast 
array  of  carriers,  is  there  any  reason  that  we  cannot  make  the  ac-
ceptance of this voluntary by the carriers? 

Mr.  MORAN.  In  our  proceeding,  we’ve  actually  asked  the  ques-
tion—currently  the  delivery  of  the  state  and  local  message  is  vol-
untary  under  our  current  rules.  We’ve  asked  the  question  whether 
it should remain voluntary—— 

Senator DEMINT. So, are you actually considering issuing a man-

date that all—everyone would have to take whatever—— 

Mr. MORAN. Well, we’ve—— 
Senator DEMINT.—you send out? 
Mr.  MORAN.—asked  the  question,  and  we’ve  got  quite  an  exten-
sive  record  on  that.  There  are  some  parties  who  believe  it  should 
be mandatory, on the record, and there are others who believe that 
voluntary  is  fine.  Some  have  argued  that  the  voluntary  aspect  has 
worked  very  well  over  the  years  and  it  should  be  allowed  to  con-
tinue. 

All  I  can  tell  you  is,  we  have  parties  on  both  sides  of  that  issue 
in  this  proceeding,  and  we  are  looking  at  that  and  studying  that, 
and  it  would  have  to  be  brought  to  the  Commission  for  a  decision 
on that. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

Senator  DEMINT.  Well,  if  my  opinion  matters,  I  happen  to  be-
lieve, at this point, that it’s likely, if it’s voluntary with full disclo-
sure—in other words, if I get a cell phone and it has disclosure that 
it does not include the warning, that our carriers would very quick-
ly create a competitive advantage for themselves by doing it better 
and  better,  and  we  would  have  a  best-practices  system  that  could 
allow  the  system  to  evolve  and  improve,  other  than  stick  to  a 
standard  that  we  create  here  this  time.  But  that’s  just  my  opinion 
at this point. 

And one other—just a quick question. I assume hard-line phones 
are  being  considered  as  part  of  this,  as  a  message,  because—since 
a lot of people are at work. Right? They’re in—— 

Mr.  HOOVER.  Yes,  sir.  And  that’s  part  of  that  whole—the  GTAS, 
the  Geo–Targeted  Alert  and  Warning,  can  use  the  land-line  phone 
system. 

Senator DEMINT. Senator Nelson, any additional questions? 
Senator BEN NELSON. Would the differentiation of warnings and 
message  and  the  audience  that  would  receive  the  warnings—in 
narrowing  that  down,  what  would  you  encounter,  in  terms  of  dif-
ficulties,  or  will  that  be  coming  forth  in  the  second  panel,  where 
they  do  a  demonstration?  Will  there  be  some  sort  of  regulatory 
problem?  Is  there  a  privacy  issue  here?  What  would  be  involved? 
Mr. HOOVER. I guess I’m not quite clear on what the question is. 
Senator  BEN NELSON.  Well,  would  I  have  to  sign  and  say  that 
I  want  to  be  notified,  or  will  it  be  an  automatic  benefit  or  service 
included within the technology that I happen to have? 

Mr.  HOOVER.  I  think  one  of  the  pieces  of  the  IPAWS  that  we’re 
doing,  and  I  mentioned  in  my  remarks,  is  that  we’re  looking  at  an 
AMBER-Alert-like  portal,  and  we’re  trying  to  build  on  the  success 
that the Department of Justice has had in disseminating alert and 
warning  messages  using  their  AMBER  Alert  system,  so  that  in 
the—at the present time, what we’re considering is an opt-in situa-
tion, so that you would go to a website that would allow you to opt 
into the types of messages that you would like—alert and warning 
messages you would like to receive, and that the only real manda-
tory  message,  at  this  point,  as  we  move  down  the  road,  would  be 
the  carriage  of  a  Presidential-level  national  emergency  message 
that  you’re  going  to  get  regardless  of  if  you  sign  up  for  it  or  not. 
We just believe that if you require every message to be carried, it’s 
going to go the way of the car alarm and people aren’t going to pay 
attention  to  the  ones  that  really  are  important  to  them,  but  folks 
will go online—and you can go on to this website, to the portal, and 
say, ‘‘I want to be notified of earthquakes and tsunamis and torna-
does,’’  whatever  those  things  might  be,  terrorist  attack,  and  you 
would get those appropriate messages. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  If  you  get  this  perfected—and  I  hope  that 
you do—will you promise me that you’ll take over the warning sys-
tem as to when we need to evacuate the Capitol? 

[Laughter.] 
Senator BEN NELSON. Get that at some level that we can appre-

Senator  DEMINT.  Yes,  let’s  just  hope  we  don’t  have  to  evacuate, 

ciate it? 

this week, right? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

Senator BEN NELSON. That’s right. Will there be an extra cost to 
the  consumer  for  the  messages?  Will  I  have  to  pay  for  my  equip-
ment? 

Mr.  HOOVER.  You  know,  Senator,  I  can’t  answer  that  question. 
Perhaps  the  private-sector  folks  in  the  next  panel  may  be  able  to 
better address the costs that may be involved. 

Senator BEN NELSON. OK. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. Thank you all. 
Senator DEMINT. It’s been very productive. I appreciate it. 
Let’s  switch  out  panels.  We  go  from  the  first  to  the  second.  I 

thank all of you, gentlemen. 

[Pause.] 
Senator  DEMINT.  Thank  you  folks  for  being  here.  This  second 
panel is composed of Mr. Richard Taylor. He’s Chair of COMCARE 
Alliance.  Mr.  Taylor  will  be  providing  a  perspective  of  the  emer-
gency-management community on what tools they need in a public- 
alert system. 

Joining  him  is  Mr.  Christopher  E.  Guttman-McCabe,  Assistant 
Vice  President  of  Regulatory  Policy  and  Homeland  Security  at 
CTIA. 

Senator  DEMINT.  Mr.  Guttman-McCabe  will  be  discussing  the 
cellular  industry’s  participation  in  recent  emergency-alert  projects 
and  discuss  the  industry’s  perspective  on  their  participation  in  the 
next-generation emergency-alert system. 

And  finally  appearing  is  Mr.  John  Lawson,  of  the  Association  of 
Public  Television  Stations.  I  understand  Mr.  Lawson  is  going  to 
run through a demonstration of the digital emergency alert system. 
I’ll  ask  Mr.  Lawson  to  begin  the  demonstration  and  provide  a 

short summary of his testimony. 

So, Mr. Lawson, if you can begin? 

STATEMENT OF JOHN M. LAWSON, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

ASSOCIATION OF PUBLIC TELEVISION STATIONS 

Mr.  LAWSON.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman,  Ranking  Member 
Nelson.  Thanks  for  inviting  me  to  testify  today  on  behalf  of  our 
members,  which  are  the  local  public  stations  across  the  country. 
I’m here to address the development of an all-hazards multiple-de-
vices warning system and the dual-use contribution that public dig-
ital television can make. 

Digital  television,  DTV,  is  really  a  very  powerful  wireless  data 
distribution  platform,  in  addition  to  HDTV  and/or  multiple  pro-
gramming  streams,  where  we  now  have  just  one.  DTV  also  can 
send  very  high-end  data  to  a  number  of  devices.  When  we  broad-
cast  data,  also  called  datacasting,  information  is  embedded  in  the 
over-the-air  digital  signal.  This  data  can  be  received  on  PCs  and 
laptops  equipped  with  commercial  off-the-shelf  DTV  tuner  cards. 
This  little  silver  box  on  the  front  of  this  table  here  is  an  example 
of  that.  This  means  very  low-cost  access  for  first-responders,  as 
well  as  schools,  hospitals,  and  other  institutions.  Datacasting  uses 
only  a  fraction  of  the  digital  spectrum,  and  it  can  run  simulta-
neously  with  HDTV  or  whatever  the  station  that’s  broadcasting  to 
viewers.  If  needed,  the  data  can  be  encrypted  so  that  only  certain 
computers—for example, in police departments—can access it. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

Datacasting is completely scalable and is bottleneck-free. Just as 
with  broadcasting  to  TV  sets,  the  information  can  be  received  by 
one viewer or one million viewers without fear of overload. Typical 
DTV signals can reach 50 to 60 miles from a single transmitter. 

As you heard from Reynold Hoover, APTS, last fall, entered into 
a  cooperative  agreement  with  FEMA  at  DHS  to  launch  a  pilot 
project  in  the  national  capital  region.  This  pilot  is  serving  as  the 
basis for the new Digital Emergency Alert System, or DEAS. APTS 
is joined by PBS and public stations WETA, here, Maryland Public 
Television,  the  New  Jersey  Network,  WHRO,  in  Norfolk,  and 
KAKM,  in  Anchorage,  as  well  as  commercial  media  and  wireless 
partners. 

Our  pilot  is  demonstrated  graphically  on  the  flowchart  at  the 
side  of  the  room,  and  I’d  be  glad  to  take  you  through  that  during 
Q&A. 

We’re  now  going  to  demonstrate  for  you  the  capabilities  of  our 
DEAS pilot. At this moment, an official at FEMA is sending a test 
alert to the PBS Satellite Operations Center in Springfield. PBS is 
uplinking  the  alert,  and  it’s  being  received  by  WETA.  Instanta-
neously, without anyone at the station touching it, WETA DTV re-
transmits  the  alert  over  the  air  within  its  digital  signal.  DHS  has 
the ability to provide text, as well as audio and video. In this case, 
we’re transmitting all three. 

We  can  also—once  a  Presidential  message  from  FEMA  comes 
through,  however,  it  takes  priority.  All  of  this  comes  over  the  air 
to  a  computer  here  via  the  small  antenna  on  the  table  in  front  of 
the  panel.  This  is  off-air.  This  small  v-shaped  antenna  here,  a 
Radio Shack antenna, is actually receiving the WETA signal off-air. 
It’s  connected  to  a  laptop  computer  over  there,  which  is  projecting 
the alert on the screen. 

So,  we  can  send  video,  as  is  opening  up  right  now,  which  shows 
you  the  flexibility  of  this  system.  We  can  send  the  text  messages. 
We can send the audio alerts. This is live from FEMA. 

This  is  coming  over  XM  satellite  radio.  And  the  cell  phones  are 
ringing,  because,  embedded  in  the  alert,  is  data  that  goes  to  the 
headends  of  the  cell  phone  companies,  and  they  can  retransmit 
that as a text message. 

So,  as  Reynold  described  this  morning,  we  are  feeding  these 
alerts  to  other  radio  and  TV  stations.  We’re  feeding  it  to  cable 
headends  and  cell  phone  and  pager  services.  The  cell  phones  are 
ringing because of the alert. 

Along  with  the  alerts,  we  can  datacast  text  and  animation  files 
over WETA. One of those files is something you all, in the Senate, 
are quite familiar with, a quick-card evacuation information sheet. 
You  can  see  on  the  screen,  the  file  has  just  opened.  This  was  sent 
as  a  file  over  the  air,  again,  to  PCs.  A  map  you’re  familiar  with  is 
also  being  displayed.  This  information  also  can  be  sent  through 
wireless through your BlackBerrys, all in a matter of seconds. 

Datacasting  can  send  just  about  any  type  of  file.  In  the  next  ex-
ample,  we  developed  a  simple  animation,  based  on  a  dirty  bomb 
going  off  at  Metro  Center.  It  forecasts  the  movement  of  the  radio-
active  plume  and  indicates  the  traffic  patterns  that  should  be  fol-
lowed as part of the evacuation plan. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

We can also datacast full motion video and audio of the President 
addressing  the  Nation,  if  necessary,  or  a  mayor  addressing  a  city. 
The  best  practices  developed  during  the  DEAS  pilot  also  are 
serving as a model for local jurisdictions. Stations around the coun-
try are entering partnerships with public safety and other agencies 
from  areas  around  nuclear  power,  chemical  plants,  and  the  Las 
Vegas casinos. Alert systems are being tested. Stations also provide 
training, such as the port-security video we’re seeing again. 

As we work with FEMA to plan the national rollout of the DEAS, 
our  members,  the  local  public  television  stations,  stand  ready  to 
play an integral part at the national, regional, state, and local lev-
els. 

I’m happy to answer any questions you may have. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Lawson follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN M. LAWSON, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

ASSOCIATION OF PUBLIC TELEVISION STATIONS 

Mr. Chairman, Ranking Member Nelson and Members of the Subcommittee: 
It is my privilege to come before you today to discuss how Public Television’s dig-
ital infrastructure can play a role—a dual-use role—in developing a new, robust and 
efficient  digital  emergency  alert  and  warning  system.  No  doubt  this  month’s  bomb-
ings  in  London  continue  to  reverberate  in  the  minds  of  the  Members  of  this  Sub-
committee.  To  me,  it  is  also  a  vivid  reminder  that  our  Nation’s  current  Emergency 
Alert System is built on an aging analog infrastructure and must be upgraded. 

But  I  am  here  to  bring  you  good  news.  That  state  of  affairs  is  beginning  to 
change,  and  I’m  pleased  to  report  that  Public  Television,  working  directly  with  the 
Department  of  Homeland  Security,  is  playing  an  integral  role  in  the  development 
of  an  all-devices,  all-hazards,  digitally-based  emergency  alert  and  warning  system. 
Digital Emergency Alert System: DEAS 

The  next  generation  of  a  national  emergency  alert  system  is  called  the  Digital 
Emergency  Alert  System,  or  DEAS.  It  will  be  based  on  Public  Television’s  digital 
transmission  infrastructure.  Like  the  current  system,  the  DEAS  is  designed  to  en-
sure that the head of our national government—the President or his successor—can 
quickly communicate to the American public during an emergency. The current sys-
tem—which, by the way, was never utilized during 9/11—is limited to two basic re-
ception  devices:  radios  and  televisions.  And  yet  today,  Americans  have  become  flu-
ent  in  an  impressive  array  of  other—often,  more  portable—devices,  including  cell 
phones,  personal  computers,  Blackberries  and  other  PDAs.  Under  the  DEAS,  the 
President  could  potentially  reach  almost  all  Americans  quickly  with  an  important 
message delivered to any one or all of these devices. 

It  is  also  important  to  note  that  the  current  Emergency  Alert  System  was  con-
ceived  during  the  cold  war  era  to  provide  warning  for  threats  that  were  national 
in  scope—namely,  a  nuclear  attack.  Today’s  most  potent  threat,  acts  of  terrorism, 
are  by  their  nature  more  local  or  regional  in  scope,  as  the  residents  of  New  York, 
Washington, Madrid and London can attest. That is why the new DEAS will provide 
a backbone that can be interconnected to deliver alert and warning at the local, re-
gional and national levels. 
Role for Public Television 

Public Television is a mission-driven institution. When our system was faced with 
the  prospect  of  undertaking  a  daunting  conversion  from  an  analog  to  digital  trans-
mission  platform,  we  naturally  began  to  explore  the  many  ways  that  this  exciting 
new digital technology could be used to benefit the American people. With the emer-
gence  of  a  digital  broadcasting  application  called  datacasting,  which  I  will  discuss 
further,  we  quickly  grasped  that  local  digital  public  television  stations  could  play 
a role in enhancing public safety. At first the idea focused on natural disasters such 
as tornadoes. And then came 9/11. 

The  other  critical  feature  of  the  Public  Television  system  is  our  penetration:  we 
reach nearly 99 percent of American households with analog service and, soon, with 
digital. Indeed, our system’s breadth is impressive, but so is our depth. We are deep-
ly  rooted  in  our  communities,  typically  among  the  most  trusted  local  institutions 
and ones that have forged strong linkages to other community institutions and pop-
ulations. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

In short, Public Television is building out a fully integrated digital infrastructure 
which,  once  complete,  will  reach  nearly  every  American  community.  The  DEAS  is 
a very cost-effective, dual-use application that builds on this infrastructure. 
What is Datacasting? 

In  order  to  appreciate  the  capabilities  of  a  DEAS,  it  is  necessary  to  understand 
the central application involved—namely, datacasting. Digital television, or DTV, is 
most  closely  associated  with  high-definition  television  (HDTV).  But  DTV  is  really  a 
powerful,  wireless  data  transmission  system.  It  is  also  very  flexible.  From  a  single 
transmitter, a broadcaster can send any mix of HDTV, multiple standard-definition 
channels, or high-end data to any DTV reception device within 50–60 miles. 

One of these applications, called datacasting, is a one-way broadcast transmission 
of Internet Protocol (IP) information. The data being transmitted can take the form 
of text, video, audio, and graphics. Datacasting uses only a portion of the broadcast 
spectrum. Moreover, datacasting can deliver large amounts of data embedded in the 
broadcast signal at a rate of up to 19.4 megabits per second (MBPS)—the equivalent 
of up to 13 T–1 lines. 

Datacasts are encoded within the digital television signal and then decoded by an 
inexpensive receiver that is easily hooked up to a personal computer, laptop or com-
puter  network.  Reception  can  be  achieved  through  a  small  portable  antenna  that 
sits on top of the PC (or laptop in the field), or users can receive the signal through 
a  conventional  rooftop  TV  antenna  or  cable.  The  signal  can  also  be  instantly  re-
transmitted over wireless and other networks. 
Advantages of Datacasting 

Datacasting boasts several key attributes: 
• Datacasting is highly scalable and congestion-free. It avoids the communications 
bottlenecks we saw in New York and Washington on 9/11. Because it is a broad-
cast  medium,  it  takes  no  more  bandwidth  to  reach  millions  of  end-users  simul-
taneously than it does a single end-user. 

• Datacasting  is  secure.  Through  additional  technology,  data  can  be  encrypted, 
rendering  it  far  less  vulnerable  to  hackers  than  Internet-based  communication. 
• Datacasting is flexible. It can be ‘‘addressed’’ through conditional access to a se-
lect  group  of  end-users  (such  as  a  Federal  agency,  a  local  fire  department  or 
a  school  district)  or  made  available  to  the  widest  possible  audience—anyone 
with a digital antenna and receiver. 

Included at the end of this testimony are several examples of current and ongoing 
Public Television datacasting projects, ranging from educational partnerships to ro-
bust  public  safety  and  training  efforts.  I  highly  recommend  that  the  Subcommittee 
review  these  examples  in  order  to  appreciate  the  wide  range  of  services  being  of-
fered  and  explored  by  Public  Television  stations  and  their  local  and  regional  part-
ners. 
Department of Homeland Security-APTS Pilot Program 

At  this  time,  however,  I  would  like  to  focus  the  Subcommittee’s  attention  on  one 
particularly important project that is being pursued jointly between the Department 
of Homeland Security and APTS. 

In  October,  2004,  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security’s  Federal  Emergency 
Management Agency (FEMA) signed a cooperative agreement with APTS to conduct 
a  Digital  Emergency  Alert  System—National  Capital  Region  Pilot  Project  (DEAS– 
NCR).  The  pilot  was  launched  to  demonstrate  how  public  television’s  digital  infra-
structure  could  be  used  to  support  the  distribution  of  Presidential  messages  to  the 
public  and  of  digital  all-hazards  Emergency  Alert  System  (EAS)  messages  to  TVs, 
radios, personal computers, telephones and wireless networks. 

Public  broadcasting  participants  in  the  pilot  include  APTS,  the  Public  Broad-
casting  Service  (PBS),  WETA–TV  and  FM,  Maryland  Public  Television,  WHRO 
(Norfolk,  VA),  KAKM  (Anchorage,  AK)  and  the  New  Jersey  Network.  These  Public 
Television entities were joined by WTOP–AM radio, WRC–TV (both in Washington, 
D.C.),  Comcast  Cable,  the  National  Cable  &  Telecommunications  Association 
(NCTA)  and  XM  Satellite  Radio.  Participating  telecommunications  industry  organi-
zations  include  Cingular  Wireless,  Nextel,  T-Mobile,  the  Cellular  Telecommuni-
cations and Internet Association (CTIA) and USA Mobility, among others. 

Phase I of this pilot project focused primarily on testing whether emergency alert 
and warning messages could be successfully transmitted to end-users in a workable 
format—known  as  the  Common  Alerting  Protocol  (CAP)  format.  The  Pilot  was  for-
mulated  around  the  concept  of  real-time  activation  by  FEMA  of  simulated  emer-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

gency  alert  and  warning  messages  into  the  DTV  network  of  PBS  and  WETA,  who 
redistribute the alert messaging to other participants in the pilot. 

I  am  pleased  to  say  that  Phase  I  of  the  pilot  project  was  a  resounding  success. 

We were able to demonstrate that this infrastructure works and works well. 
Phase II of the DEAS–NCR Pilot 

Based  on  the  success  of  the  first  phase  of  the  DEAS–NCR  Pilot,  the  Department 
of  Homeland  Security  has  extended  the  pilot  by  an  additional  6  months.  The  ex-
tended  pilot  program  will  lay  the  foundation  for  the  national  roll-out  of  a  digitally- 
based Federal public safety alert and warning system. 

Phase II has three major components. 
• First, the Pilot will spend additional time on testing and evaluation, as well as 
provide  an  opportunity  to  further  develop  the  components  of  the  pilot  system. 
Additional  testing  sites  beyond  those  in  Phase  I  of  the  pilot,  including  one  or 
more  state  emergency  operations  centers  (EOCs)  and  several  additional  public 
broadcast  stations  outside  the  National  Capitol  Region,  are  being  incorporated 
in Phase II. 

• Second, APTS will work in coordination with other alert and warning pilots and 
vendors, such as the one that DHS is developing to provide satellite connectivity 
to  the  Nation’s  current  Primary  Entry  Point  (PEP)  stations.  These  other  pilots 
are  also  consistent  with  DHS’s  goals  for  an  Integrated  Public  Alert  and  Warn-
ing  System  (IPAWS)  framework.  The  goal  here  is  to  ensure  that  a  DEAS  can 
work  with,  and  be  complementary  to,  other  aspects  of  an  improved  national 
alert and warning system. 
• Third  is  the  development  of  a  DEAS  National  Deployment  Plan  as  well  as  a 
final  DEAS  Pilot  Report  for  Congress.  The  DEAS  National  Deployment  Plan 
will  include  construction  and  timeline  estimates,  technical  risk  determinations 
and other technical implementation options. 

Next Steps 

We  at  APTS  are  gratified  to  play  a  role  in  this  effort,  and  our  member  stations 
are fully committed as well. We could not be more pleased with the way the DEAS– 
NCR Pilot has progressed and how that might translate to a fully developed, robust 
national  alert  and  warning  system.  I  would  also  like  to  commend  Reynold  Hoover 
and his colleagues at FEMA for their foresight in recognizing the dual-use features 
of DTV, and for forging a very productive working relationship with us. 

Going  forward,  there  are  two  elements  that  I  have  not  yet  mentioned  that  I  be-

lieve are critical to the ultimate viability of the DEAS. 
Satellite Interconnection 

First is the replacement of Public Television’s satellite interconnection system. As 
you  are  probably  aware,  national  programming  is  currently  distributed  from  PBS 
to  the  more  than  350  local  public  television  stations  via  a  satellite  interconnection 
system.  That  system  is  wearing  out  and  is  scheduled  to  go  dark  in  October  2006— 
when  the  current  leases  on  satellite  transponders  expire.  Congress  has  funded  two 
of  four  installments  for  a  replacement,  Next  Generation  Interconnection  System 
over  the  past  two  appropriations  cycles.  Continued  appropriations  in  FY  2006  are 
extremely  important  to  secure  long-term  leases  on  new  satellite  capacity  as  well  as 
enhanced  terrestrial  distribution  capabilities.  This  is  relevant  to  the  subject  of  to-
day’s hearing, because the same infrastructure that ensures distribution of national 
programming also forms the backbone for distribution of emergency alert and warn-
ing messages under DEAS. 
Local Origination 

At  the  local  level,  it  is  also  important  that  we  plan  for  and  provide  resources  for 
local  origination  equipment.  The  purpose  of  local  origination  is  to  allow  local  com-
munities  to  take  advantage  of  the  Federal  DEAS  whenever  emergencies  of  a  local 
or regional nature occur. If, for example, a tsunami were to develop in the northern 
Pacific  Ocean,  headed  toward  Alaska  and  the  Pacific  Northwest,  it  would  be  essen-
tial that local stations have the ability to augment and enhance the level of commu-
nication about the tsunami to the affected citizenry. 

Similarly,  any  number  of  communities  that  lie  within  the  range  of  hurricanes— 
from  Gulf  States  to  the  Atlantic  seaboard—would  benefit  from  a  fully  integrated 
local  and  national  warning  system  that  would  enhance  the  NOAA  weather  service. 
Datacasting  can  be  used  not  only  to  provide  initial  warning  but  also  to  distribute 
detailed  information  such  as  evacuation  routes,  instructions  for  sheltering  in  place 
and  other  safety  tips.  Information  is  crucial  in  any  crisis,  whether  a  chemical  spill 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

at  an  industrial  site,  an  incident  at  a  nuclear  power  plant,  or  other  man-made  or 
natural disasters. 

The ability to create and distribute local and regional messages and data packets 
is  vital  to  a  fully  integrated  emergency  alert  and  warning  system.  It  is  in  the  best 
interest of the American people, who expect local and national coordination in times 
of  crisis.  Fortunately,  the  capability  necessary  to  accomplish  this  is  within  our 
grasp. 
Conclusion 

Public  Television  is  gratified  that  we  can  play  a  role  in  helping  to  shape  our  Na-
tion’s  next  generation  emergency  alert  and  warning  system,  and  most  importantly 
to deliver that capability. It is a natural extension of our public service mission. We 
believe  that  one  day  in  the  near  future  Public  Digital  Television  will  play  a  crucial 
role during a crisis that will save lives and calm fears. 

Thank you for giving me the opportunity to testify today. 

Senator  DEMINT.  Just  a  quick  question  and  I  want  to  get  to  the 
other panelists. As far as our BlackBerrys are concerned, would our 
server  have  to  coordinate  with  you  for  it  to  come  through  my 
BlackBerry, or could that just be automatic? 

Mr.  LAWSON.  By  arrangement  with  the  service  provider—and  I 
don’t know who you use, in the Senate—it would be passed through 
automatically. 

Senator DEMINT. OK. 
Mr.  LAWSON.  Your  server  would  not—as  I  understand  it;  and  I 
don’t  understand  the  Senate  firewalls—but,  generally  speaking,  no 
one’s touching this data. If, by prior arrangement, your service pro-
vider  has  agreed  to  handle  this  messaging,  no  one  touches  it;  it 
goes right through. 

Senator DEMINT. So, the servers of these BlackBerrys, regardless 
of  the  Senate  or  what—does  not—they  don’t  necessarily  have  to 
have a lot of new technology, or whatever, to do it? 

Mr.  LAWSON.  This  is  why—the  Common  Alerting  Protocol  and 
the  Integrated—the  IPAWS  that  the  witnesses  testified  about  this 
morning, make sure that it passes through. There is nothing extra 
on  the  receive  end,  in  terms  of  the  text  messaging,  that  would  be 
necessary. 

Senator DEMINT. I’ll save my other questions. But, since I’ve spo-

ken, Senator Nelson, if you wanted to say anything—— 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Now,  for  example,  a  cell  phone  was  ring-
ing. Is that technology aimed at some sort of GPS or by area code? 
What  if  I  have  an  area  code  from  Nebraska  on  my  cell  phone,  but 
I’m located here? Does it contact me? What may be important here, 
in  terms  of  a  localized  disaster,  might  not  be  important  out  there, 
vice versa. 

Mr.  LAWSON.  I  know  that  FEMA  and  NOAA  are  working  on  the 
geographical targeting. Our pilot doesn’t do that. But I can tell you 
that it does—this system fully supports conditional access. The sig-
nal  goes  out  to  everyone,  but  only  certain  devices,  such  as  Senate 
BlackBerrys,  might  have  the  authorization  to  receive  it.  It  might 
be card, it might a code, it might be a thumbprint. So, we can seg-
ment  that  way.  Also,  although  we’re  sending  information,  this  test 
data,  over  the  PBS  satellite,  so  anything  public  state  or  state  net-
work, like Nebraska ETV in the Nation, can take it. You automati-
cally have geographic localization of that kind, at least on the state 
and national—regional level. 

Senator BEN NELSON. OK, thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Senator DEMINT. Mr. Guttman-McCabe? 

32 

STATEMENT OF CHRISTOPHER GUTTMAN-MCCABE, 

ASSISTANT VICE PRESIDENT, HOMELAND SECURITY AND 

REGULATORY POLICY, CTIA—THE WIRELESS ASSOCIATIONTM 
Mr. GUTTMAN-MCCABE. Thank you. 
Good  morning,  Chairman  DeMint  and  Senator  Nelson.  I  am 
Christopher  Guttman-McCabe,  Assistant  Vice  President  for  Home-
land  Security  and  Regulatory  Policy  at  CTIA—The  Wireless  Asso-
ciation.TM 

I am privileged to appear before you today to discuss the wireless 

industry’s efforts regarding an all-hazards network. 

The  wireless  industry  recognizes  the  importance  of  this  effort. 
CTIA  and  the  industry  have  dedicated  significant  resources  to  ad-
dress  this  issue.  We  have  coordinated  our  efforts  through  the  De-
partment  of  Homeland  Security  and  FEMA.  The  industry  also  re-
cently launched a wireless AMBER Alert project that not only will 
help to protect our Nation’s children, but also will provide a useful 
template  as  the  industry  moves  forward  with  an  emergency  alert 
service. 

The wireless industry, like many other high-tech industries, is in 
a  process  of  continual  change  and  renewal.  The  industry  has  in-
vested  billions  of  dollars  in  its  networks,  and  consumers  have  in-
vested  billions  of  dollars  in  their  handsets,  their  wireless  PDAs, 
and  their  data  cards.  Manufacturers  and  service  providers  unveil 
new  capabilities  almost  daily.  New  technologies  and  services  are 
likely to extend both the reach and the capacity of wireless. A sen-
sible  emergency  alerting  policy  must  take  into  account  both  the 
massive investment in place today and investment that defines the 
capabilities  that  can  be  used  this  year,  as  well  as  next,  and  the 
technological  developments  that  propel  the  industry  in  the  long 
run. 

CTIA,  working  with  the  industry,  has  initiated  a  two-part  ap-
proach  to  the  emergency  alert  issue.  The  goal  is  to  balance  the  in-
dustry’s  existing  capabilities  with  the  perceived  requirements  of 
emergency  alert  service,  at  the  same  time  recognizing  that  the  in-
dustry  is  evolving.  Unlike  the  existing  emergency  alert  service 
which  operates  on  a  broadcast  network  designed  to  transmit  mes-
sages  from  one  point  to  multiple  points,  the  existing  wireless  was 
designed to be point-to-point, one customer to another customer. 

Accordingly,  the  industry  is  partnering  with  FEMA  on  a  pilot 
project, that you heard Mr. Hoover talk about earlier, that will ini-
tially  utilize  the  industry’s  text-message  capability,  its  SMS  capa-
bilities.  While  there  are  both  limitations  on  the  number  of  SMS 
messages  that  can  be  sent  during  any  one  period  of  time,  as  well 
as  on  the  number  of  characters  that  can  be  contained  in  any  one 
single  message,  there  is  one  significant  benefit  to  the  short-term 
use  of  SMS,  and  that  is  that  it  is  available  today.  However,  this 
initial  service  must  be  approached  with  caution,  as  the  limitations 
and concerns regarding both capacity and message content are like-
ly to arise during an emergency. 

As  part  of  the  second,  longer-term  element  of  the  industry’s  ef-
fort,  CTIA  and  the  industry  are  investigating  mechanisms  for  geo-
graphic  delivery  of  messages.  This  second-stage  effort  is  designed 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

to  take  advantage  of  the  constant  evolution  that  is  a  hallmark  of 
our  industry.  The  industry  is  looking  into  what  role,  if  any,  capa-
bilities  such  as  cell  broadcasts  could  play  in  the  emergency  alert 
environment.  Additionally,  the  industry  is  investigating  other  po-
tential delivery mechanisms, including whether the existing NOAA 
service  could  be  incorporated  into  a  wireless  phone,  as  well  as 
whether SMS messages can be targeted geographically. 

Several  of  the  capabilities  being  investigated  for  longer-term  de-
livery would require the industry to address issues including stand-
ardization,  product  development  and  deployment,  and,  possibly, 
handset replacement. In the interim, CTIA continues to work with 
FEMA  on  the  creation  of  a  framework  for  development  of  an  alert 
service  that  ultimately  can  be  transmitted  on  multiple  retrans-
mission media. CTIA and the industry believe that any emergency 
alert service should not focus solely on the wireless network, as the 
networks  are  not  currently  designed  to  pass  messages  to  all  active 
subscribers  simultaneously.  Rather,  an  emergency  alert  service 
should  utilize  the  full  range  of  communications  devices,  such  as 
phones,  e-mail,  and  instant  messaging,  radios,  television  sets,  and 
satellite. 

The efforts discussed above are only part of the work being done 
in  this  area.  More  work  needs  to  be  completed,  and,  ultimately, 
government  can  help.  A  true  government-industry  partnership,  as 
occurred  during  the  creation  of  the  wireless  priority  service,  will 
aid  in  that  development.  CTIA  and  the  industry  believe  that  it  is 
counterproductive  to  have  a  statutory  mandate  in  this  environ-
ment.  Application  of  the  wireless  priority  service  model  of  govern-
ment-industry partnership will lead to a solution that takes advan-
tage of the industry’s creativity and ingenuity. 

As  government  and  industry  move  forward  with  both  a  short- 
term and possibly longer-term solution, addressing issues including 
liability relief, establishment of a service description, designation of 
an authority for development, as well as operation of the alert serv-
ice, and funding, will be beneficial. CTIA and the industry look for-
ward  to  continuing  the  partnership  between  government  and  in-
dustry. 

Thank you, again, for this opportunity to discuss the wireless in-
dustry’s  efforts.  We  look  forward  to  working  with  you  and  your 
staffs  toward  a  service  that  will  benefit  American.  And  I  look  for-
ward to addressing any questions that you might have. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Guttman-McCabe follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHRISTOPHER GUTTMAN-MCCABE,  ASSISTANT VICE 
PRESIDENT, HOMELAND SECURITY AND REGULATORY POLICY, CTIA—THE WIRELESS 
ASSOCIATION TM 
Good  morning  Chairman  DeMint,  Ranking  Member  Nelson,  and  distinguished 
members  of  the  Subcommittee.  I  am  Christopher  Guttman-McCabe,  Assistant  Vice 
President for Homeland Security and Regulatory Policy at CTIA, The Wireless Asso-
ciation.TM CTIA  is  the  international  organization  that  represents  all  sectors  of  the 
wireless  communications  industry:  wireless  carriers,  manufacturers,  and  data  com-
panies. I am privileged to appear before you today to discuss the wireless industry’s 
efforts  regarding  creation  of  an  all  hazards  network  and  what  role  government  can 
play in that effort. 

The  wireless  industry  recognizes  the  importance  of  this  effort.  CTIA  and  the  in-
dustry  have  dedicated  resources  to  examine  this  issue  and  are  working  toward  an 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

emergency  alert  capability.  CTIA  and  the  industry  have  coordinated  their  efforts 
with  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  and  the  Federal  Emergency  Manage-
ment Agency (FEMA), as well as with the Federal Communications Commission. As 
discussed  below,  the  industry  also  recently  launched  a  voluntary  Wireless  AMBER 
Alert  Service  that  not  only  will  help  to  protect  our  Nation’s  children,  but  also  may 
provide  a  useful  template  as  the  industry  moves  forward  with  an  Emergency  Alert 
service.  While  the  AMBER  alert  service  differs  from  an  Emergency  Alert  service  in 
that  the  AMBER  Alerts  are  not  necessarily  initiated  during  a  time  of  severe  net-
work  congestions  (as  is  likely  the  case  in  the  context  of  an  Emergency  Alert),  the 
industry already has begun to learn from the provision of this service. 
Background 

The wireless industry, like many other high-tech industries, is in a process of con-
tinual change and renewal. The wireless industry has invested billions of dollars in 
their  networks.  Additionally,  consumers  also  have  invested  billions  in  handsets, 
wireless PDAs, and data cards. The industry runs on a mix of technologies varying 
from  first  generation  analog  to  the  latest  third-generation  designs.  Manufacturers 
and service providers unveil new capabilities every few days. New technologies and 
services are likely to extend both the reach and capacity of wireless. Unfortunately, 
we do not know today what all those new capabilities will be or when they will be-
come  available.  A  sensible  emergency  alerting  policy  must  take  into  account  both 
the  massive  investment  in  place  today—an  investment  that  defines  the  capabilities 
that  can  be  used  this  year  and  next—and  the  technological  developments  that  pro-
pel the industry in the long run. 

Developing  a  national  emergency  alerting  policy  should  not  be  a  one-time  event. 
Going  forward,  there  should  be  a  continuing  process  for  identifying  the  emergency 
alert  environment,  as  well  as  industry  capabilities.  Uses  and  expectations  of  the 
service  will  indicate  what  may  be  appropriate  for  capacity  of  message  delivery  in 
the  short  term  and  long  term.  Further,  the  scope  of  who  uses  the  system  and  for 
what  purpose  is  very  important  to  understand  as  it  relates  to  the  cost  to  develop, 
the management of the service, and effectiveness of the system. 

CTIA, working with the industry, has initiated a two-part approach toward devel-
opment of an Emergency Alert capability. The goal is to balance the industry’s exist-
ing  capabilities  with  the  perceived  requirements  of  an  Emergency  Alert  service,  at 
the same time recognizing that the industry is evolving. The continued evolution of 
the  industry  likely  will  result  in  different  options  being  considered  for  delivery  of 
Emergency Alert messages. For example, currently there is nothing deployed in the 
network  for  delivering  messages  to  a  specific  targeted  geographic  area.  Handsets 
and/or  networks  would  have  to  be  upgraded  or  replaced  in  order  to  provide  such  a 
service,  and  development  and  deployment  of  any  geographic  service  would  take 
time. 

Accordingly, CTIA and the industry are initially working within existing capabili-
ties  to  establish  and  initiate  a  voluntary  effort  to  deliver  Presidential-level  Emer-
gency  Alert  messages  via  Short  Message  Service  (SMS),  or  text  message,  to  those 
subscribers that opt in to a participating carrier. As discussed below, CTIA and the 
wireless industry are partnering with FEMA on a pilot project that initially will uti-
lize  the  industry’s  existing  SMS,  or  text  message,  capabilities.  The  SMS  capability 
exists  in  the  majority  of  handsets,  and  is  provided  by  the  overwhelming  majority 
of carriers. 

While there are both limitations on the number of SMS messages that can be sent 
during  any  one  period  of  time,  as  well  as  limitations  on  the  number  of  characters 
that  can  be  contained  in  any  single  message,  there  is  one  significant  benefit  to  the 
short-term  use  of  SMS—it  is  available  today.  Utilizing  SMS  initially  will  work  to 
avoid  a  significant  amount  of  the  development  time  frame  that  will  accompany  the 
solutions  discussed  below.  However,  this  initial  service  must  be  approached  with 
caution,  as  the  limitations  and  concerns  regarding  both  capacity  and  message  con-
tent are likely to arise during an emergency. 

Unlike  the  existing  Emergency  Alert  network,  which  operates  on  broadcast  net-
works designed to transmit messages from one point to multiple points, the existing 
wireless  network  was  designed  to  be  point  to  point—one  customer  to  another  cus-
tomer,  where  the  network  has  to  route  calls  and  text  messages  using  switches  and 
databases  to  direct  traffic  to  individual  users.  In  this  environment,  utilization  of 
SMS  to  retransmit  messages  likely  will  result  in  latency  of  delivery  of  the  message 
to consumers. However, as was concluded in the Wireless AMBER Alert context, an 
SMS  offering—despite  its  expected  limitations—is  the  best  existing,  short-term  op-
tion for delivery of alert messages. 

Second,  as  part  of  the  longer  term  effort  going  forward,  CTIA  and  the  industry 
are investigating mechanisms for geographic delivery of messages. This second stage 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

effort  is  designed  to  take  advantage  of  the  constant  evolution  that  is  the  hallmark 
of  the  wireless  industry.  The  goal  is  to  address  the  capacity  issues  that  are  part  of 
any  SMS-based  alert  service,  as  well  as  to  develop  a  capability  for  targeting  mes-
sages  geographically.  The  capability  to  deliver  messages  geographically  currently 
does  not  exist  in  wireless  networks  in  the  United  States.  Wireless  service  is  based 
on point-to-point communications, and has not been designed for point-to-multipoint 
broadcast. 

The industry is looking into what role, if any, services such as cell broadcast could 
ultimately  play  in  the  Emergency  Alert  environment.  Additionally,  the  industry  is 
investigating  whether  the  existing  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administra-
tion  (NOAA)  service  can  be  incorporated  into  a  wireless  phone,  as  well  as  whether 
SMS  messages  can  be  targeted  geographically.  Recent  developments,  including  but 
not  limited  to  broadcast  offerings  on  wireless  phones,  as  well  as  services  such  as 
Qualcomm’s  proposed  MediaFlo  offering,  highlight  how  the  industry  and  its  tech-
nology are in transition. 

Several of the capabilities being investigated for a geographic-based service would 
require the industry to address issues including standardization (both of the under-
lying product as well as the alert development and delivery process), product devel-
opment  and  deployment,  as  well  as  the  need  for  handset  turnover  if  the  service  is 
not  available  in  existing  handsets.  In  the  interim,  CTIA  continues  to  work  with 
FEMA on the creation of a framework for development of an alert service that ulti-
mately  can  be  transmitted  on  multiple  retransmission  media,  including  wireless. 
CTIA  and  the  industry  believe,  however,  that  while  wireless  can  be  a  component 
of  any  alerting  service,  any  Emergency  Alert  service  should  not  focus  solely  on  the 
wireless  network,  as  the  wireless  networks  are  not  currently  designed  to  pass  a 
message to all active subscribers simultaneously. Rather, an Emergency Alert serv-
ice  should  utilize  the  full  range  of  communications  devices,  such  as  wireline  and 
wireless  telephones,  e-mail  and  instant  messaging  systems,  radios  and  television 
sets. 
FEMA Capitol Region Pilot Project 

CTIA  has  been  working  diligently  with  carriers,  manufacturers,  and  FEMA  on  a 
digital Emergency Alert pilot project in the national capitol region. The pilot project, 
being  directed  by  FEMA,  coordinated  with  the  Association  of  Public  Television  Sta-
tions (APTS), and utilizing the digital broadcast spectrum, is designed to provide the 
Nation with an enhanced alert system. The goal of the first phase of the project was 
a ‘‘proof of concept’’ that Emergency Alert messages can be sent from FEMA to pub-
lic  broadcasters,  imbedded  in  the  digital  broadcast  spectrum,  and  then  re-trans-
mitted to third parties, including wireless carriers. A portion of the imbedded Emer-
gency Alert message contained a text file that the wireless carriers were able to ex-
tract. Phase 1 of the pilot project has successfully been completed. 

As part of the second phase of the pilot project, FEMA, APTS, and the five nation-
wide wireless carriers that are participating in the project will now focus on making 
the  service  scaleable  so  that  messages  that  are  initiated  by  FEMA  ultimately  can 
be passed through directly to the wireless carriers’ networks. To date, several of the 
carriers  have  successfully  re-transmitted  a  test  message  to  a  small  portion  of  their 
employee  base.  The  goal  is  to  ensure  that  a  system  is  in  place  whereby  a  message 
can  originate  at  FEMA,  and  be  transmitted  and  retransmitted  without  ever  being 
edited, touched, or handled by any of the participating companies. Ultimately, Phase 
II  of  the  pilot  project  envisions  that  an  Emergency  Alert  message  will  be  retrans-
mitted to some portion of the carriers’ customer base. 

As discussed above, the carriers, initially, will utilize their existing SMS capabili-
ties to retransmit a text message to customers that opt-in to receive the alerts. Ulti-
mately,  carriers  may  use  one  of  the  other  longer-term  methods  being  considered  to 
retransmit  the  message  to  a  specific  geographic  location.  Whatever  method  a  com-
pany chooses to utilize for retransmission, the industry is looking forward to comple-
tion of an Emergency Alert process that ultimately can take advantage of any of the 
new  capabilities  or  services  that  will  emerge  from  this  highly  innovative  industry. 
AMBER Alerts 

The  industry  already  is  pursuing  use  of  the  wireless  phone  for  the  safety  of  the 
country.  On  its  own  initiative,  the  industry  has  launched  a  Wireless  AMBER  Alert 
Service  that  will  provide  another  level  of  safety  to  its  customers  and  the  American 
public. This service enhances the industry’s vast array of socially responsible initia-
tives.  Partnering  with  the  National  Center  for  Missing  &  Exploited  Children 
(NCMEC)  as  well  as  the  Department  of  Justice  (the  designated  national  AMBER 
Alert  coordinator),  the  wireless  industry  is  making  potentially  life-saving  AMBER 
Alert  text  messages  available  to  wireless  subscribers  who  ‘‘opt-in’’  to  the  offering. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

The carriers currently participating collectively provide service to more than 90 per-
cent  of  U.S.  wireless  customers.  The  service  has  been  designed  to  be  scaleable  so 
that additional carriers can continue to join the effort going forward. 

Wireless AMBER Alerts will significantly increase the reach of the AMBER Alert 
notification  program.  Past  experiences  indicate  the  first  3  hours  are  critical  to  the 
successful  recovery  of  an  abducted  child,  and  the  Wireless  AMBER  Alerts  will  be 
an  invaluable  tool  in  assisting  the  search  process.  According  to  the  NCMEC,  Wire-
less  AMBER  Alerts  will  potentially  serve  as  a  preventive  tool  as  well.  People  who 
prey  on  innocent  children  will  perhaps  think  twice  before  carrying  out  their  mali-
cious acts, knowing that almost any cell phone owner they pass could identify a per-
petrator and have access to the immediate means to guide law enforcement officials 
to their location. 

Under  the  program,  the  subscribers  of  participating  carriers  may  ‘‘opt-in’’  to  re-
ceive  Wireless  AMBER  Alerts,  and  may  do  so  at  www.wirelessAMBERalerts.org,  or 
by visiting their wireless service provider’s website. 
Going Forward 

The  efforts  discussed  above  are  only  a  part  of  the  work  being  done  in  this  area. 
More work needs to be completed, and, ultimately, government can help. A true gov-
ernment/industry  partnership  will  facilitate  development  and  deployment  of  the 
service.  The  wireless  industry  has  in  its  immediate  past  an  example  of  what  can 
happen when government and industry partner voluntarily on the creation of a new 
service—Wireless  Priority  Service.  Wireless  Priority  Service  is  a  White  House-di-
rected  National  Security/Emergency  Preparedness  program,  through  the  National 
Communications  System,  that  utilizes  the  commercial  wireless  networks  to  deliver 
priority  access  to  key  government  officials  during  times  of  crisis  and  high  call  vol-
ume. Government, through both the National Communications System and the Fed-
eral  Communications  Commission,  worked  with  industry  on  development  of  the  re-
quirements for the service, but did not mandate a solution. Instead, government has 
provided  funding  to  manufacturers  and  vendors  for  development  of  the  capability, 
resulting in rapid deployment of the service in two phases. 

CTIA  and  the  wireless  industry  believe  that  it  is  counter-productive  to  have  a 
statutory mandate in this environment. Application of the Wireless Priority Service 
model  of  government/industry  partnership  will  lead  to  a  solution  that  takes  advan-
tage  of  the  industry’s  creativity  and  ingenuity.  As  government  and  industry  move 
forward with both a short-term and possibly longer-term solution, the following are 
some of the issues that would benefit from joint government/industry consideration: 
• Liability relief. As with the Broadcasters that currently provide the Emergency 
Alert  service,  the  industry  requires  full  liability  protection  for  delivery  of  any 
Emergency Alert message, both for any short-term solution and any longer-term 
solution. 
• Service  Description.  A  joint  government/industry  partnership  to  develop  the  re-
quirements  of  any  emergency  alert  service  that  ultimately  would  result  in  the 
development  and  adoption  of  standards.  This  partnership  will  allow  manufac-
turers to build to specific requirements. 
• Designation  of  Authority  for  Development  of  an  Emergency  Alert  Service.  Des-
ignation of a specific authority responsible for balancing local, state and Federal 
requirements against industry capabilities. 
• Designation  of  Authority  for  Operation  of  an  Emergency  Alert  Service.  Designa-
tion of a specific authority tasked with operation of the Emergency Alert service 
as well as creation of a clear set of rules governing who is permitted to generate 
messages  and  under  what  circumstances  they  can  be  generated,  coupled  with 
a process to authenticate and secure any Emergency Alert messages. Due to the 
possibility  of  a  hoax  transmission,  this  process  must  guarantee  the  integrity  of 
the messages from the point of origination to delivery. 
• Research, Development, Deployment and Implementation Support. The provision 
of funding to support research and development, as well as deployment and im-
plementation, will benefit the establishment of a nationwide alert service. 

Conclusion 

CTIA  and  the  industry  look  forward  to  continuing  the  partnership  between  gov-
ernment  and  industry  toward  development  of  an  Emergency  Alert  service.  Thank 
you  again  for  this  opportunity  to  discuss  the  wireless  industry’s  efforts  that  could 
contribute to an all hazards network and what role the Government should play in 
that  effort.  We  look  forward  to  working  with  you  and  your  staff  toward  a  service 
that will benefit America. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

Senator DEMINT. Thank you. 
Mr. Taylor? 

STATEMENT  OF  RICHARD  TAYLOR,  EXECUTIVE  DIRECTOR, 
NORTH  CAROLINA  WIRELESS  911  BOARD;  CHAIRMAN,  THE 
COMCARE  ALLIANCE  AND  E–911  INSTITUTE;  PARTNER,  THE 
NATIONAL  EMERGENCY  ALERTING  AND  RESPONSE 
SYSTEMS INITIATIVE (NEARS) 
Mr.  TAYLOR.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Senator  Nelson. 

Thank you so much for the opportunity to testify. 

My  name  is  Richard  Taylor.  I’m  the  Executive  Director  of  the 
North  Carolina  Wireless  911  Board.  I  also  have  the  privilege  of 
chairing the COMCARE Alliance. I am also Chair of the E–911 In-
stitute. And today there are few issues that are more important to 
our members than the one that we’re discussing here and now. 

COMCARE  is  a  national  nonprofit  alliance  dedicated  to  advanc-
ing emergency response. COMCARE is unique in that we represent 
the wide diversity of the emergency-response community. 

I am also testifying on behalf of the National Emergency Alerting 
and Response Systems Initiative, or NEARS. The 17 national orga-
nizations  that  are  NEARS  partners  represent  over  40,000  indi-
vidual  agencies  and  over  400,000  individuals  in  the  emergency-re-
sponse profession. 

The  most  effective  public  warning  system  is  one  that  achieves 
the greatest possible reach. It is one that is used for all-hazards re-
porting, not just for specific incidents. However, there will never be 
one  system  that  solves  the  problem.  An  interoperable  solution  for 
public  warning  will  not  be  achieved  by  purchasing  a  new  national 
emergency-alert  network  for  the  100,000-plus  emergency  agencies, 
much  less  solve  the  other  public  and  private  organizations  that 
need to be part of an emergency network. 

We  must  focus  on  connecting  these  emergency  agencies  through 
one  system  of  systems,  or  an  internetwork.  This  emergency  inter-
network  will  allow  these  organizations  to  contact  the  public 
through growing numbers of consumer devices. 

Another  key  component  is  emergency  data  standards  for  public 
warning. The Common Alerting Protocol fundamentally solves that 
problem.  Now  we  need  vendors  to  build  interfaces  to  those  stand-
ards.  Agencies  have  invested  millions  of  dollars  to  equip  them-
selves.  We  need  to  leverage  these  investments  instead  of  replacing 
them. 

Progress  is  already  being  made.  DHS  and  DOJ  are  leading  the 
development  of  emergency  data  dictionaries,  models,  and  emer-
gency  message  standards.  SAFECOMM  and  related  efforts  are 
making  significant  progress  on  the  radio  interoperability  front.  As 
evidenced  by  NEARS  and  other  developments,  the  leadership  of  a 
significant  number  of  emergency  professions  has  put  their  turf 
aside, in favor of cooperation. 

A  critical  missing  piece  is  a  new  idea,  the  need  for  a  routing  di-
rectory.  Almost  every  one  of  the  emergency  warning  systems  has 
a different owner with different jurisdictions or geographical inter-
ests, different incident interests, and different electronic addresses. 
These  differences  have  always  existed,  but  the  advancements  in 
technology  have  created  new  questions.  How  does  an  agency  send-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

ing  an  alert  know  who  the  right  organization  is  for  public  alerting 
in  the  target  area,  much  less  their  correct  computer  address,  inci-
dent  interest,  or  geographic  area  of  those  interests?  The  answer  is 
that  no  central  entity  can.  That  is  why  the  shared  registry,  the 
emergency  provider  access  directory,  or  EPAD,  makes  so  much 
sense.  If  an  organization  wants  to  receive  alerts  and/or  public 
warnings,  either  for  itself  or  to  pass  on  to  others,  it  would  simply 
need  to  register  in  the  EPAD,  with  proper  authorization.  Instead 
of the inefficient creation of single-purpose directories, there should 
be  one  shared  routing  directory  for  all-hazards  messaging,  owned 
and  managed  on  a  nonprofit  basis  by  the  emergency-response  pro-
fession. 

We also need a similar shared rights-management system. What 
agencies  are  allowed  to  send  alerts?  What  agencies  are  allowed  to 
receive different types of alerts? 

COMCARE has been working on these exact issues for more than 
4 years. The result was a prototype of EPAD designed by teams of 
emergency  practitioners  and  contributed  by  DICE  Corporation.  I 
would be delighted to schedule a time to show this to you. 

Thanks  to  a  major  grant  from  the  Department  of  Justice,  we 
have  run  a  series  of  national  demonstrations  using  EPAD.  We’ve 
funded  the  development  of  more  than  one-hundred  pages  of  vetted 
final  design  and  detailed  technical  architecture  for  both  routing 
and  rights  management  modules,  and  we  have  them  right  here 
today. We are ready to build the production version. The next step 
of the NEARS initiative is to obtain the funding. 

NEARS  is  a  unique  plan  to  make  a  successful  all-hazards  alert-
ing  system  possible.  NEAR  brings  together  leading  emergency-re-
sponse  organizations  around  a  common  architecture  and  a  specific 
plan,  not  a  particular  product.  The  detailed  NEARS  proposal  is 
available on the Internet, at NEARS.us. The NEARS proposal pro-
vides  for  national  demonstrations,  building  the  production  EPAD 
routing  and  rights  management  tools,  and  detailed  beta  field  test-
ing.  It  serves  multiple  missions,  so  it  should  be  funded  from  mul-
tiple pockets of already appropriated funds. We believe it can move 
to  a  self-sustaining  basis  in  2  years,  with  interim  Federal  funding 
of less than $20 million. 

The  NEARS  partner  organizations  have  created  a  unique  multi- 
professional effort. We need your support to deliver on this promise 
for the American public. We request that Congress strongly encour-
age agencies to fund NEARS from already appropriated funds. 

Thank  you  so  much  for  your  attention,  and  I’ll  entertain  any 

questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Taylor follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF RICHARD TAYLOR, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, NORTH CAROLINA 
WIRELESS 911  BOARD;  CHAIRMAN,  THE COMCARE  ALLIANCE AND E–911 
INSTITUTE;  PARTNER,  THE NATIONAL EMERGENCY ALERTING AND RESPONSE 
SYSTEMS INITIATIVE (NEARS) 
Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Committee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to 
testify  before  you  today  on  this  critical  topic.  There  are  few  issues  more  important 
to our membership than the one you are discussing today. 

COMCARE is a national non-profit alliance dedicated to advancing emergency re-
sponse  by  promoting  modern,  interoperable  emergency  communications  systems, 
and  the  development  of  new  procedures,  training,  and  tools  to  maximize  value  for 
emergency responders. COMCARE encourages cooperation across professional, juris-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

dictional  and  geographic  lines,  and  works  to  integrate  the  emergency  response  pro-
fessions,  government,  private  industry  and  the  public.  COMCARE’s  100+  organiza-
tional members represent the wide diversity of the emergency response community. 
For more information visit www.comcare.org. 

COMCARE’s goal is to promote an integrated, coordinated approach to emergency 
communications  and  support  the  development  of  a  comprehensive  ‘‘end-to-end  sys-
tem’’  to  link  the  public  to  emergency  agencies,  and  to  link  those  agencies  together. 
Introducing 21st Century information and communications technologies to the often- 
antiquated  communications  infrastructure  of  emergency  agencies  will  save  thou-
sands  of  lives  each  year,  substantially  reduce  the  severity  of  injuries,  and  enhance 
homeland security. 

Our  members  have  a  vision  of  an  integrated  emergency  communications  and  in-
formation system linking the public to emergency agencies, and linking the agencies 
to  each  other  in  a  seamless  network.  This  integrated  network  would  equally  serve 
to protect Americans during both daily and mass emergencies. The goal is to incor-
porate  today’s  systems  with  tomorrow’s  technology  under  the  cooperative  guidance 
of local and national leadership. 

I  am  also  testifying  on  behalf  of  the  National  Emergency  Alerting  and  Response 
Initiative  (NEARS).  Our  NEARS  partners  include  the  American  College  of  Emer-
gency  Physicians  (ACEP),  the  American  Public  Health  Association  (APHA),  the 
Brain  Trauma  Foundation  (BTF),  COMCARE,  the  Emergency  Interoperability  Con-
sortium (EIC), the Emergency Nurses Association (ENA), the Fraternal Order of Po-
lice  (FOP),  the  George  Washington  University  Homeland  Security  Policy  Institute 
(GWHSPI),  the  International  Association  of  Emergency  Managers  (IAEM),  the  Na-
tional Association of EMS Physicians (NAEMSP), the National Association of EMTs 
(NAEMT),  the  National  Association  of  State  EMS  Directors  (NASEMSD),  the  Na-
tional Emergency Number Association (NENA), the National Volunteer Fire Council 
(NVFC), the Public Broadcasting Service, and others. See www.nears.us. 
Summary of Testimony 

We  believe  there  are  five  essential  building  blocks  for  an  effective,  interoperable 

national public warning system. 

• Interoperable pathways for agencies to exchange information 
• Multiple communications channels from emergency agencies to the public 
• A standards based system 
• A series of shared Facilitation Services 
• Use rules defined by emergency leaders and implemented through the Facilita-

tion Services 

Functional  interoperability  will  not  come  from  building  a  single  new  network,  or 
multiple  ones  for  specific  types  of  warnings.  There  are  close  to  100,000  emergency 
agencies.  There  are  hundreds  of  high  quality  communications  systems  in  the  emer-
gency  response  and  communications  community  now,  and  in  the  media.  The  phys-
ical networks to connect these organizations mostly already exist. We must take ad-
vantage  of  the  extensive  networks  that  are  already  in  place  and  the  tools  that  are 
used  everyday  by  our  emergency  agencies.  We  should  think  of  this  as  an  ‘‘internet-
work’’,  and  focus  on  connecting  a  wide  variety  of  wireline  and  wireless  networks 
that are controlled by a large number of separate entities. 

This  emergency  internetwork  will  allow  organizations  to  contact  the  public 
through  all  the  burgeoning  number  of  devices  they  have,  not  just  one  or  two:  wire-
less voice and data messaging, television, radio, beepers, ISPs, mass calling, and the 
like.  Most  discussions  of  public  warning  focus  on  this  part  of  the  process,  the  end 
point  in  the  hands  or  living  rooms  of  citizens.  The  COMCARE  and  NEARS  focus 
has been on the other necessary pieces to make an all hazards system work. 

Standards  create  a  common  language  that  enables  data  sharing  between  thou-
sands  of  individual  agency  proprietary  systems,  and  with  the  public.  For  public 
warning,  the  Common  Alerting  Protocol  (CAP)  standard  fundamentally  solves  that 
problem,  particularly  when  the  EDXL  Distribution  Element  becomes  a  standard  as 
we hope it will later this year. Now the primary standards challenge is getting ven-
dors to use them, to create interfaces to them. 

The next issue is shared Facilitation Services. How does the sending agency know 
who the right organizations for public alerting in a target area are, much less their 
correct computer addresses, incident interests, and the geographic areas of those in-
terests? Instead of the inefficient profusion of single purpose directories (and the in-
accuracy that flows from such proliferation), there should be one shared routing di-
rectory system (actually a federated system of directories) for all hazards messaging, 
owned  and  managed  on  a  non-profit  basis  by  the  emergency  response  professions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

The same comments and shared system apply to the needed rights management sys-
tem.  The  Emergency  Provider  Access  Directory  (EPAD)  NEARS  and  we  advocate 
performs these routing and rights management functions. 

Finally,  it  is  important  to  separate  technical  capabilities  from  policy  rules  gov-
erning  their  use.  Technically,  we  need  a  system  that  connects  every  emergency  re-
lated organization together in the internetwork. That does not mean that any agen-
cy  is  allowed  to  send  or  receive  any  message  or  have  access  to  any  data.  We  need 
organizations  at  local,  tribal,  state  and  national  levels  to  develop  the  policies  and 
protocols that determine the rights and roles of agencies in the system, and manage-
ment rules for it. 

The  National  Emergency  Alerting  and  Response  Systems  (NEARS)  Initiative  has 
a  unique  plan  to  make  a  successful  All-Hazards  Alerting  system  possible.  NEARS 
brings  together  a  wide  variety  of  leading  emergency  response  organizations  around 
a  common  architecture  and  specific  plan,  not  a  particular  product.  With  several  re-
gional and national demonstrations, using a prototype of EPAD (a map-based direc-
tory  of  agencies  for  routing  data),  we  have  proved  that  sharing  data  messages  be-
tween agencies according to data standards is an extremely effective way to commu-
nicate with a wide variety of public warning systems. Thanks to a significant grant 
to  COMCARE  from  the  Department  of  Justice,  EPAD  has  been  specifically  defined 
by teams of emergency practitioners, and an extremely detailed design has been cre-
ated.  We  have  more  than  100  pages  of  design  and  a  detailed  technical  architecture 
for both routing and rights management modules that are awaiting funding. 

The 16 national organizations that are NEARS partners represent over 40,000 in-
dividual  agencies  and  over  400,000  individuals  in  the  emergency  response  profes-
sions.  Our  proposal  serves  multiple  agency  missions,  from  public  warning,  to  emer-
gency  agency  communications,  to  public  health.  We  request  that  Congress  strongly 
encourage DHS and HHS to fund NEARS from already appropriated funds. 
Overall Comments 

A  public  warning  interoperability  solution  will  not  be  achieved  by  the  Federal 
Government  purchasing  a  new  national  emergency  alert  network  or  buying  a  soft-
ware  application  for  the  100,000-plus  emergency  agencies—much  less  all  the  other 
public and private organizations that need to be part of an emergency network. In-
stead,  emergency  agencies  and  their  communications  capabilities  should  be  viewed 
as  a  single  ‘‘enterprise’’,  with  tens  of  thousands  of  agency  owners.  This  enterprise 
needs to provide full interoperability among all agencies (and related organizations), 
delivering secure information and communication to/from response agencies and re-
sponders.  It  needs  to  include  comprehensive  public  warning  and  education.  To  be 
cost efficient, it must be multi-user, multi-use, and all hazards. 

The  most  effective  public  warning  system  will  be  one  that  gets  emergency  mes-
sages to the widest variety of possible alerting mechanisms ensuring that the great-
est levels of penetration are achieved. It will be one that is used for all hazards re-
porting,  not  just  tsunamis,  or  weather,  or  homeland  security  alerts.  More  impor-
tantly,  it  will  be  one  that  allows  agencies  to  communicate  directly  with  the  public 
and  those  organizations  authorized  to  send  out  disaster  warnings  directly  to  citi-
zens.  Finally,  there  will  never  be  one  ‘‘system’’  that  solves  the  problem.  We  must 
have  a  capability  that  links  all  alerting  solutions  and  allows  for  multiple  methods 
of  communication.  That  means  it  must  be  driven  by  data  standards  and  based  on 
an open architecture. It should not have single points of failure. 

The  National  Emergency  Alerting  and  Response  Systems  (NEARS)  Initiative 
meets these criteria and can provide a solution to help our country achieve its goals. 
I am here today to ask you to support it as part of your broader, overall effort. 
The Problem 

Public  warning  rests  on  a  simple  action:  some  government  agency  needs  to  send 
out a warning. Sometimes this goes directly to the public; sometimes it goes to other 
emergency  agencies  or  organizations  for  them  in  turn  to  notify  the  public.  Some-
times the key targets of alerts are the individual employees of an agency or profes-
sion (e.g., first responders, physicians). 

In  an  era  where  technology  can  bring  news,  current  events  and  entertainment  to 
the  farthest  reaches  of  the  world,  to  almost  any  electronic  device,  most  U.S.  emer-
gency  response  agencies  and  personnel  cannot  share  data  with  each  other,  even 
within the same jurisdiction, much less with the public they serve. 

Most new cell phones can take and transmit pictures to any person on the Inter-
net.  If  there  were  a  small  pox  outbreak,  it  would  be  enormously  valuable  for  CDC 
to be able to send pictures of pustules to 911, EMS, the media, and other key orga-
nizations so they could communicate them to the public. ‘‘If you have skin that looks 
like this, stay at home. Do not come into the hospital or contact others.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

But most emergency response agencies cannot send or receive such data. 
9/11  challenged  the  security  of  the  United  States  and  the  safety  of  its  citizens. 
Those challenges have identified weak spots in effective communication. Such emer-
gencies demand real-time data and inter-operable communication across all jurisdic-
tions and professional boundaries so that agencies can provide information and serv-
ice  to  the  public.  There  is  an  urgent  need  for  broadband  digital  network  capability 
for  real-time,  inter-agency,  emergency  communication,  with  seamless  and  effective 
communication  capability  from  and  to  the  public.  Telephone  and  fax  will  not  meet 
the  need.  Unfortunately,  because  we  don’t  have  standards  or  an  open  architecture, 
to  achieve  functional  interoperable  data  communications  today  requires  the  con-
struction  of  innumerable,  specialized  interfaces  as  demonstrated  in  Figure  1.  Each 
of these interfaces needs to be replicated in every community. This is an unworkable 
model. 

It  is  simply  impossible  to  achieve  the  National  Incident  Management  System 
(NIMS)  requirements  for  Communications  and  Information  Management 1 without 
interoperable,  interagency  data  communications.  Yet  today  there  are  more  than 
100,000 emergency response agencies and the vast majority of them are not able to 
rapidly,  accurately  and  easily  communicate  data  with  each  other,  much  less  the 
public.  Except  at  the  highest  levels  of  government  (e.g.,  State  EOCs  and  Governors 
that  have  been  given  data  sharing  tools  by  DHS),  there  is  no  regional  or  national 

1 NIMS Chapter 5. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
y
a
t

42 

emergency data communications capability. In simple terms, the President, the Sec-
retary  of  Homeland  Security,  the  Governor,  or  the  EOC  of  any  state,  county,  tribe 
or city do not have the ability to send or receive secure emergency messages to most 
of the more than 100,000 emergency agencies in our country or those in a particular 
state.  Indeed,  there  is  no  comprehensive  electronic  directory  of  these  agencies  that 
would enable the routing of such messages. 

Underlying  this  is  a  clear  lack  of  a  comprehensive  local,  State  or  national  emer-
gency communications and IT infrastructure. Most of the communications platforms 
used  today  are  designed  as  one-off  systems  and  solutions.  The  current  system  is 
voice-centric,  and  filled  with  stove  pipes  of  information.  There  is  little  data  sharing 
between agencies, much less with the private sector. Different agencies’ information 
systems—computer-aided  dispatch,  emergency-management  tools,  public  health  ap-
plications,  wireless  data  systems  in  the  field,  alerting  and  warning  systems  of  all 
kinds—need to exchange up-to-the-minute information, but they cannot. 
Solution Overview 

Emergency  responders  are  being  asked  to  do  one  of  the  most  important  jobs  in 
our society with generally the least advanced communications and information tech-
nology.  The  emergency  community  needs  an  integrated  communications  and  infor-
mation system for efficient preparedness, public warning, and response. This system 
needs to connect all emergency agencies with voice, data and video, not simply pro-
vide  wireless  voice  and  data  connections  to  agency  staff  at  the  scene  of  incidents 
(which  is  a  critical  need).  It  also  needs  to  connect  the  public  to  agencies  and  vice 
versa.  The  system  needs  to  exploit  the  latest  commercially  available  technologies, 
be  highly  secure,  and  provide  emergency  agencies  with  control  over  their  data.  Fi-
nally,  we  believe  it  needs  to  empower  responders,  giving  them  the  flexibility  to  use 
emergency  information  in  the  ways  they  (not  vendors  or  some  central  authority) 
choose, reflecting the different needs and capabilities of agencies in the communities 
of  our  country.  Evacuating  a  town  in  rural  Montana  is  quite  different  than  evacu-
ating Atlanta. 
Recent Progress 

There  has  been  important  progress  in  the  last  year.  DHS  and  DOJ  are  leading 
the  development  of  both  emergency  data  dictionaries/models  and  emergency  mes-
sage  standards.  Project  SAFECOMM  and  related  efforts  are  making  significant 
progress on the radio interoperability front. DHS and leading technology companies 
are  supporting  a  range  of  data  interoperability  trials.  A  vision  and  plan  for  future 
emergency  communications  structure  is  emerging  from  the  FCC’s  Network  Reli-
ability  and  Interoperability  Council  (NRIC)  and  similar  proceedings.  As  evidenced 
by NEARS and other developments, the leadership of a significant number of emer-
gency  professions  has  put  ‘‘turf ’’  aside  in  favor  of  cooperation.  These  developments 
are new and incomplete, but encouraging nonetheless. 
Public Warning or Interagency Emergency Communications? 

Some draw a distinction between public alerting and interagency emergency com-
munications. Certainly at a policy and specific use level, these can be different, but 
in  general  we  do  not  think  the  two  topics  can  be  distinctly  separated.  Often  at  the 
state  or  local  level  the  agency  with  information  that  needs  to  be  communicated  to 
the  public  (or  the  one  with  the  tools  that  contact  the  public)  is  the  state  or  local 
911  center,  police  department  or  Emergency  Manager.  We  must  first  make  certain 
that  emergency  response  agencies  have  the  ability  to  efficiently  receive  and  share 
emergency  information  of  all  types.  Without  that  assurance  there  will  be  no  accu-
rate information to share with the public. We must also ensure that these agencies 
know  who  the  right  outlets  are  to  notify  the  public  and  how  to  share  information 
with them in real-time. As the train collision in South Carolina in January showed, 
this is usually not the case in complicated emergencies. 
What Systems Are Involved? 

Right  now  there  are  scores,  indeed  thousands,  of  emergency  notification  outlets 
to  the  American  public.  And  they  are  generally  controlled  by  thousands  of  inde-
pendent emergency response agencies, few of which are connected to each other elec-
tronically (except by voice telephone). Here is a partial list. 

ters. 

• *Reverse  911  systems  installed  at  or  controlled  by  some  of  our  6,500  911  cen-
• *A  wide  variety  of  public  individual  notification  registration  systems  (e.g.,  D.C. 
Alert) in many of the 4,000 state, city and county emergency operations centers. 
• Commercial  registration  warning  systems  (e.g.,  some  of  the  Amber  Alert  initia-

tive; wireless company SMS systems). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

• *Similar systems for senior officials (e.g., RICCS and Roam Secure in D.C.). 
• *Public  Health  Alert  Networks  from  health  departments  linking  physicians, 

hospitals, labs (e.g., Virtual Alert in Virginia). 

• *NOAA, National Weather Radio. 
• Commercial and public media: TV, radio, cable, satellite. 
• Non-traditional media: XM Radio, Sirius, Internet Service Providers. 
• Wireless carriers; paging companies. 
• *Specialized  community  warning  systems  (e.g.,  around  DOE  and  DOD  facili-

ties). 

• *The traditional Emergency Alert System using broadcast systems. 
• *DOT 5-1-1 and private traffic services. 
• *DOT intelligent transportation public systems (e.g., electronic road signs). 
• Telematics suppliers and/or their customers (e.g., OnStar and ATX). 
• Internal corporate notification systems. 
We have placed an asterisk next to the ones that are generally considered govern-
ment  emergency  agencies—and  might  be  initiating  public  warnings  on  their  own, 
or  because  some  agency  like  DHS  told  them  to  do  so.  We  believe  the  definition  of 
‘‘agency’’ should include the entire above list, although the private ones would prob-
ably  not  be  initiating  alerts  on  their  own).  We  also  have  over  140,000  schools—and 
they  generally  aren’t  on  all  hazards  warning  systems  although  some  have  weather 
radios now and they are now almost all connected to the Internet due to the e-Rate 
program. 
The Directory Problem 

Almost every one of the systems listed above has a different owner, with different 
jurisdiction or geographical interests, different incident interests, and different elec-
tronic addresses. 

How are you going to find out that critical warning/alerting information distribu-
tion  data  and  then  keep  it  current?  The  answer  is  that  no  central  entity  can,  local, 
state or Federal. That is why a shared registry where the organizations themselves 
enter  this  information—in  other  words,  the  EPAD  we  advocate—makes  so  much 
sense.  If  an  organization  wants  to  receive  alerts  and/or  public  warnings,  either  for 
itself, or to pass on to others, it simply needs to register in EPAD, and be authorized 
to do so. In about 10 minutes using a web interface, any such organization can enter 
what kinds of alerts it wants to get, for what geographic area, and delivered to what 
electronic  address(es).  Then  any  authorized  messaging  system  can  query  the  data-
base and deliver the alerts. 

Indeed,  using  the  directory  to  enable  (provide  the  addressees  for)  all  emergency 
messages,  not  just  the  subset  that  are  national  alerts,  makes  it  much  more  likely 
that  agencies  and  other  organizations  will  register  and  keep  their  information  up 
to date—so that they can be reached by public alerts and warnings. 

NEARS offers the ability to reach any organization (i.e., the above list) that is reg-
istered  to  receive  or  disseminate  a  public  warning  message  based  on  a  geographic 
location. The detailed design of EPAD is done; it is ready to be built. 
Current Warning Procedure 

Let’s look at a generic public warning message that does not originate at the Fed-

eral level. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

911  receives  a  call  about  flooding  in  a  large  area  that  affects  roadways,  public 
buildings and a residential area. 911 calls the responsible emergency operations cen-
ter (EOC) to notify them about the flood. It may also call other agencies. 

The EOC determines that other agencies like traffic management and law enforce-
ment  must  be  called.  The  EOC  enters  the  incident  information  into  its  system.  It 
then looks up the telephone numbers for the agencies to be notified in its own direc-
tory—if it has one—and calls them one-by-one. It determines that a public warning 
message  must  be  disseminated  to  those  located  in  that  area.  However,  it  can  only 
do  so  by  using  a  zip  code  to  target  the  message.  Some  may  get  the  warning  and 
are not affected. Others may not get the warning and could be affected. 

Currently, the EOC uses three different systems to send out public warning mes-
sages—a text alert system, a voice alert system, and a website. The EOC enters the 
flood-warning  message  into  each  system  so  that  warning  messages  can  be  dissemi-
nated. 

The  process  involves  making  many  phone  calls  and  manually  entering  the  inci-
dent message into each agency’s system and each alerting system. The result—valu-
able  time  wasted,  with  an  increasing  possibility  of  message  errors  due  to  multiple 
manual entries. 

For there to be an effective public alerting system there must be only one commu-
nications  system  for  all  events.  One  system  should  be  created  to  contact  the  public 
for  all  events,  ranging  from  child  abductions,  to  hurricanes,  to  terrorist  attacks. 
Having  multiple  systems  for  different  types  of  alerts  is  wasteful  because  it  creates 
several  systems  which  have  a  limited  range  of  contact,  instead  of  creating  one,  all- 
inclusive system. One system will allow all registered agencies and organizations to 
send and receive messages about any event. 

Saying  that  there  should  be  one  system,  does  not  mean  there  should  be  one  set 
of  rights,  one  set  of  use  protocols,  or  any  similar  capability  which  is  unique  to  an 
incident type. The point of Facilitation Services is to have electronic tools that allow 
those different capabilities and rules to be implemented. 
Essential Parts of a National All-Hazards Alert System 

There must be one system for all warnings, not one for each kind. There are tens 
of thousands of alerts that are sent to emergency agencies, the media, and the pub-
lic each year, and there are thousands of agencies who are responsible for reporting 
these  warnings.  Cellular  phones,  Internet,  CAD  systems,  text  messaging,  beepers, 
television,  radio,  cable  should  all  be  used  for  public  alerting.  The  technology  exists 
to create this integrated alerting system. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
2
y
a
t

45 

There are five essential building blocks or layers for an effective interoperable na-
tional  emergency  communications  system;  they  are  the  same  for  a  national  public 
warning  system.  Some  of  these  layers  will  be  provided  on  highly  competitive  terms 
by  multiple  parties,  some  are  shared  Facilitation  Services  offered  by  collections  of 
emergency  response  agencies,  while  others  are  components  that  will  be  unique  to 
individual agencies: 

1. Pathways for agencies to exchange information. 
2. Pathways from the agencies to the public. 
3. Emergency communications standards. 
4. A set of shared Facilitation Services for routing, rights management, security 
and the like. 
5. Institutions to define rules and policies. 

1. Interagency Communication 

For  a  successful  integrated  public  warning  system  to  exist  there  must  be  inter-
operable communication between agencies. Local 911 centers, HSOC, NOAA, FEMA, 
and  emergency  responders  should  be  linked  by  an  alerting  network  that  allows 
these  agencies  to  receive  and  disseminate  the  information  they  need  as  quickly  as 
possible. We don’t need to build a new network. Commercial telecommunications en-
tities,  and  state  and  local  governments,  have  already  deployed  massive  fiber,  sat-
ellite  and  wireless  infrastructures.  We  need  to  assume  an  ‘‘internetwork’’,  con-
necting a wide variety of wireline and wireless networks, controlled by a large num-
ber of separate entities. 

This  can  be  the  public  Internet;  that  has  the  advantage  of  being  available  to  al-
most  any  agency  immediately,  and  for  very  low  cost.  However,  many  localities  and 
states  have  developed  their  own  private  IP  networks;  these  provide  better  perform-
ance.  The  primary  policy  issue—and  one  that  is  very  familiar  to  this  Committee— 
is getting all emergency agencies to establish broad band connections. 
2. Standards 

Standards create a common language that enables data sharing between the thou-
sands of individual agency proprietary systems. It is no solution to require all agen-
cies to use the same information technology tools. Most agencies will not be willing 
to  let  someone  else  make  these  decisions  for  them,  nor  will  they  be  comfortable  or 
efficient  using  tools  that  they  do  not  use  on  a  daily  basis.  The  costly  alternatives 
are to develop individual interfaces for each source of data, or to acquire complicated 
and  expensive  systems  that  sit  between  agencies  and  translate  each  agency’s  data 
language into the others. 

Common  standards  allow  data  communication  among  the  disparate  systems  that 
are already in use, along with new applications as they are introduced into the sys-
tem, by essentially building a single interface for all such purposes. 

Standards  have  to  be  national.  National  standards  mean  local  and  state  tech-
nology  choices  will  expand  and  prices  should  improve,  following  the  experience  of 
the  private  sector  with  the  commercial  computer  industry.  It  is  equally  important 
that representatives from the full range of emergency response professions be at the 
table during the national standards development process. 

The  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS)  through  OMB’s  Disaster  Manage-
ment  eGov  Initiative  identified  the  need  for  data  interoperability  using  common 
standards. DHS is facilitating a process, in which COMCARE is proud to be a part-
ner,  that  brings  together  leaders  of  the  emergency  professions  that  need  to  share 
data during emergency response operations. The project is developing and field test-
ing  a  common  set  of  emergency  message  standards  (the  Emergency  Data  Exchange 
Language,  EDXL).  It  is  also  supporting  broader  efforts  to  develop  common  data 
terms  and  models,  specifically  the  National  Information  Exchange  Model  (NIEM) 
project,  that  is  based  on  the  excellent  pioneering  work  of  the  Global  Justice  XML 
Data  Dictionary  and  Model.  We  strongly  support  these  efforts,  and  are  using  these 
standards in NEARS and our other demonstrations. 
3. Communications to the Public 

To  get  to  the  public,  you  first  have  to  get  the  alert  to  emergency  agencies  and 
other  organizations  (e.g.,  the  media).  Agencies  and  organizations  will  receive  alerts 
and  warnings  on  a  wide  variety  of  information  technology  tools  before  they  can  de-
cide  to  (or  automatically)  re-transmit  those  warnings  to  the  public  each  serves. 
There  are  numerous  emergency  applications  in  use  today,  including  complex  Com-
puter  Aided  Dispatch  Systems  (CAD),  web-based  emergency  management  tools, 
alerting systems for notifying emergency staff, mass residential communications sys-
tems,  and  other  applications.  Each  of  these  systems  has  their  own  unique 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

functionality; agencies should be encouraged to purchase the tools that are best suit-
ed  for  them.  However,  it  is  critical  that  these  applications  all  have  a  standardized 
interface:  the  ability  to  send  and  receive  XML  messages  to  other  applications  in 
standardized formats. When 911 is in charge of public alerting, it should not matter 
to a 911 CAD system that it is receiving data from an emergency management tool 
about a flood, a bioterrorism alert from CDC, or data about a 911 call from a wire-
less  company.  The  same  data  interface  should  be  used.  That  is  what  the  standards 
are all about. 

Another set of applications and services are those that compete to deliver informa-
tion from these agency-based applications to the public. These can range from tradi-
tional  ones  that  provide  links  through  landline  telephones,  radio,  or  data  connec-
tions, to NOAA weather radios, to beepers, warning radio systems, and even the tra-
ditional sirens. Broadcast television, radio, cable, Internet service providers and oth-
ers  provide  other  outlets  to  the  public.  In  some  cases  these  are  linked  to  more  so-
phisticated systems which enrich incident messages with associated data from mul-
tiple sources. 

Much of the debate about public warning has tended to revolve around the issues 

of consumer devices: which is ‘‘best’’? Should there be mandates? 

We  believe  that  public  warning  is  today  like  a  doughnut.  There  is  a  lot  of  capa-
bility at the edges where the vast array of systems touch the public. There is a large 
hole  in  the  middle.  Our  preference  would  be  to  focus  on  filling  the  whole,  making 
warnings  available  in  standardized  forms  to  all  these  outlets  as  appropriate,  and 
then see what other steps need to be taken. 
4. Facilitation Services 

‘‘Facilitation  services’’  are  shared  tools,  services  and/or  resources  that  are  offered 
by  collective  effort  of  the  emergency  response  community,  and  are  available  to  au-
thorized  emergency  entities  to  enable  interoperability.  These  include,  but  are  not 
limited  to,  security,  diagnostics,  routing  directory,  agency  rights  management,  data 
rights management, and authentication. 

Without  a  directory  of  agencies  and  their  electronic  addresses,  public  warning 
messages  cannot  be  routed.  Rather  than  the  inefficient  profusion  of  single  purpose 
directories  that  is  growing  today,  we  believe  there  should  be  one  shared  directory 
system, owned and managed by the emergency response professions. This should be 
a  secure  registry  where  authorized  agencies  enter  their  name,  contact  information, 
professional  function,  level  of  government,  incident  interests  (and  the  geographical 
area of both jurisdiction and interest for each type of incident), and emergency data 
delivery  address(es).  Only  authenticated  and  authorized  agencies  will  have  access 
to it on a non-discriminatory basis. 

Authentication and rights management are critical as well. There must be a trust-
ed  way  to  credential  agencies  and  individuals,  provide  them  with  appropriate  au-
thorizations  (both  sending  and  receiving),  and  allow  them  access  to  and  use  of  the 
network.  Linking  networks  will  require  systems  that  will  assure  only  authorized 
parties may participate, assign them appropriate rights and roles, and authenticate 
communications  from  them.  Rights  management  also  needs  to  be  applied  to  data 
itself. 

COMCARE  has  been  working  on  these  exact  issues  for  more  than  4  years.  The 
result  is  the  Emergency  Provider  Access  Directory  (EPAD).  A  routing  prototype  de-
veloped  as  a  contribution  to  the  public  interest  by  our  member  DICE  Corporation 
is available at http://www.epad.us. We are using this in field trials and demonstra-
tions all over the country. 

Thanks  to  a  major  grant  from  the  Department  of  Justice  the  EPAD  concept  has 
been advanced a long way. There is now a detailed design of the production version 
of  EPAD.  More  than  100  pages  of  design  and  a  detailed  technical  architecture  are 
awaiting  funding  to  do  the  coding.  This  will  provide  both  routing  and  rights  man-
agement modules. 
5. Policies and Protocols 

It is important to separate technical capabilities from policy rules governing their 
use.  Technically,  we  need  a  system  that  connects  every  agency  together  in  a  net-
work.  And  the  word  ‘‘agency’’  must  include  many  private  sector  entities.  But  that 
does  not  mean  that  any  agency  should  be  allowed  to  send  or  receive  any  message 
or have access to unregulated data. 

COMCARE  believes  that  emphasis  should  be  placed  on  system  flexibility,  and 
local  control,  using  the  rights  management  Facilitation  Services  to  allow  for  mes-
sages  to  be  generated  from  local  and  state  emergency  managers  (to  their  appro-
priate  audiences)  as  well  as  national  sources.  After  all,  most  emergencies  are  local. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

We need to develop the policies and protocols that determine the rights and roles 
of  agencies  in  the  system,  and  management  rules  for  it;  a  local  911  center  should 
not  have  the  same  access  within  the  system  as  a  Governor.  Some  of  these  policies 
(and  the  decision-making  bodies)  are  already  in  place  today,  whether  they  are  offi-
cially written policies or not. Many are not, and most lack all the parties they need 
to be effective in this regard. The local, state and Federal law enforcement commu-
nities are most advanced in this regard. Most other emergency agencies are not in-
volved because sharing emergency information between them has not been done be-
fore.  All  of  these  policies  and  protocols  will  need  to  be  addressed  in  terms  of  elec-
tronic communication. 

Applying  this  architecture  results  in  a  very  different  approach  than  Figure  One. 
Figure  Two  shows  a  more  rationalized  system  where  appropriate  functions  are 
shared. 

NEARS 

The  National  Emergency  Alerting  and  Response  Systems  (NEARS)  Initiative  im-
plements  national  emergency  message  standards,  commercial  information  tech-
nologies,  and  the  EPAD  shared,  electronic  directory  of  agencies  being  developed  by 
a non-profit public/private partnership. 

NEARS  is  endorsed  and  led  by  a  growing  and  diverse  coalition  of  emergency  re-
sponse  and  industry  organizations.  Participation  by  others  is  actively  encouraged. 
It  is  a  three-track  initiative  that  promotes  the  concept,  develops  the  service,  and 
tests the service for national implementation with actual deployments in several re-
gions. 

NEARS  was  created  to  bring  together  the  respective  players  in  the  emergency 
alerting area, and to provide a forum for government, industry and other interested 
parties  to  work  together  to  improve  the  Nation’s  public  warning  and  emergency 
messaging  capability.  Together  we  plan  to  demonstrate  and  deploy  interoperable 
emergency data messaging, using national emergency message and data standards, 
commercial  information  technologies,  and  the  EPAD  shared,  electronic  directory  of 
agencies. This directory gives agencies the ability to distribute emergency messages 
based on geography, incident or agency type, for all types of emergency events. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
3
y
a
t

48 

Our  NEARS  partners  include  the  American  College  of  Emergency  Physicians 
(ACEP),  the  American  Public  Health  Association  (APHA),  the  Brain  Trauma  Foun-
dation  (BTF),  the  ComCARE  Alliance,  the  Emergency  Interoperability  Consortium 
(EIC),  the  Emergency  Nurses  Association  (ENA),  the  Fraternal  Order  of  Police 
(FOP),  the  George  Washington  University  Homeland  Security  Policy  Institute 
(GWHSPI),  the  International  Association  of  Emergency  Managers  (IAEM),  the  Na-
tional Association of EMS Physicians (NAEMSP), the National Association of EMTs 
(NAEMT),  the  National  Association  of  State  EMS  Directors  (NASEMSD),  the  Na-
tional Emergency Number Association (NENA), the National Volunteer Fire Council 
(NVFC), the Public Broadcasting Service, and others. 

Some  criticize  responders  for  only  communicating  within  their  professional  silos. 
However,  the  growing  number  of  organizations  who  support  NEARS  clearly  dem-
onstrate  that  there  is  willingness  to  change.  Collectively,  the  NEARS  partner  orga-
nizations  represent  a  large  cross  section  of  the  emergency  response  community— 
Law Enforcement, Fire, EMS, Public Health, 911, Emergency Management, and the 
media.  We  do  not  have  all  the  groups  we  want,  but  the  current  partners  represent 
over  40,000  individual  agencies  and  over  400,000  individuals  in  the  emergency  re-
sponse profession. This is a solid foundation and the initiative continues to add part-
ners.  We  hope  you  will  strongly  encourage  DHS  to  fund  this  project,  providing  the 
ability  for  emergency  response  organizations  of  all  types  to  share  information 
amongst  themselves  and  with  the  public  during  emergencies.  It  serves  a  variety  of 
homeland security purposes. 

The  NEARS  partners  seek  to  attract  involvement  from  all  the  leadership  groups 
of these professions and from additional segments such as hospitals, transportation, 
state and local government and keep it growing. 

Once NEARS is deployed, this is how this same scenario would play out. 

911 receives the call and enters incident information into its system and requests 
that  the  message  be  sent  to  all  appropriate  agencies  in  the  area.  The  911  system 
then queries EPAD and using an EDXL Distribution Element sends a CAP message 
to all agency addresses that are returned. 

The message is entered once—into the 911 system and disseminated electronically 
to all appropriate agencies as well as to the public alerting systems if the EOC elect-
ed  to  do  so.  The  EOC  can  then  schedule  public  dissemination  once  the  message  is 
reviewed  and  approved.  The  whole  process  is  quick  and  efficient  and  the  public  is 
notified  in  time  for  them  to  react—no  phone  calls,  no  multiple  entries,  no  errors. 
When  a  user  or  other  entity  initiates  a  login  or  message,  EPAD  Identity  Rights 

Management authenticates it and indicates what privileges are allowed. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
4
y
a
t

49 

If the user and/or system or device is allowed to create and send an incident mes-
sage,  the  message  can  be  created  and  EPAD  can  be  queried  for  instructions  as  to 
where to send it. The system or device can query EPAD directly or it can use a mes-
sage broker service that will query EPAD and disseminate it for the entity. In either 
case, a web service query is sent indicating the type and time of the incident, where 
it  occurred  and,  if  applicable,  what  types  of  agencies  should  be  notified.  EPAD  will 
search  the  directory  to  determine  the  entities  that  requested  this  type  of  informa-
tion.  It  will  send  back  a  list  of  all  entities  indicating  how  the  entity  wishes  to  be 
contacted.  It  can  be  a  system  to  system  transmission,  an  automated  phone  call  to 
certain individuals and/or other types of contact. 

The  system  or  message  broker  then  sends  the  message  to  all  entities  simulta-
neously.  If  the  user  and/or  entity  is  authorized  to  do  so,  it  can  review  the  list  first 
and make changes to the distribution list before dissemination. 
Public Broadcasting 

A special word about public broadcasting is in order. I am delighted that they are 

represented at this hearing. 

Public broadcasting can play a critical role in emergency preparedness, emergency 
communications  and  public  warning.  As  John  Lawson  of  APTS  has  testified,  there 
have  been  successful  experiments  in  data  casting  using  digital  capacity  of  stations 
and the PBS interconnection. We commend APTS and DHS for those forward think-
ing  trials.  We  encourage  the  proliferation  of  this  capability.  But  to  limit  public 
broadcasting  to  this  role  would  be  to  give  up  some  critical  strengths  it  can  offer. 
In  addition  to  whatever  data  casting  capability  public  broadcasting  might  have  in 
the  future,  we  should  take  full  advantage  of  three  unique  attributes  it  can  offer  us 
today: 

• Network  capacity  provider:  PBS  has  a  national  backbone  digital  satellite  and 
terrestrial network reaching every state and significant community in the coun-
try. 
• Local  television  and  radio  signals  reach  out  from  that  core  network  to  cover 
• Public broadcasting is made up of trusted and respected local and national pub-
lic  service  organizations  that  could  be  a  ‘‘Switzerland’’  in  bringing  together  all 
the relevant parties. 

over 99 percent of Americans. 2 

PBS is a NEARS partner. We think PBS could be a national leader in convening 
the  coalition  partners  to  identify  the  connectivity  and  interconnection  requirements 
locally, regionally and nationally of the various agencies and organizations. Second, 
PBS  would  work  in  collaboration  with  the  initiative  partners  to  incorporate  agreed 
to  standards,  routing  and  authorization  applications,  data  messaging  formats  and 
any  necessary  trial/pilot  demonstrations.  The  NEARS  Initiative  is  exactly  such  a 
nonprofit public service coalition project. 
Conclusion 

The detailed NEARS proposal is available at www.nears.us. It is based on the im-
portant  investment  by  the  Justice  Department  in  EPAD,  and  the  DHS  investment 
in  common  emergency  messaging  standards.  The  NEARS  proposal  provides  for  na-
tional  demonstrations,  building  production  quality  EPAD  routing  and  rights  man-
agement  tools,  and  detailed  beta  field  testing  of  them.  Because  it  serves  the  mis-
sions  of  multiple  government  agencies,  it  is  the  priority  of  none  of  them.  Because 
it  serves  multiple  missions,  it  can  and  should  be  funded  from  multiple  ‘‘pockets’’  of 
already  appropriated  funds.  We  believe  it  can  move  to  a  self-sustaining  basis  in  2 
years, with Federal funding of less than $20 million. 

Thanks to the leadership of my colleagues from the other NEARS partner organi-
zations  we  have  created  a  unique,  multi-professional  effort.  We  have  overcome  the 
turf  concerns.  We  need  your  support  to  deliver  on  this  promise  for  the  American 
public. 

Senator  DEMINT.  Mr.  Guttman-McCabe,  let  me  ask  you  a  ques-
tion. One of my concerns in this process is, we’ll come up with man-
dates,  for  instance,  that  wireless  services  will  have  to  broadcast  a 

2 Beyond  pure  technical  contributions,  we  just  recognize  that  public  broadcasting  is  made  up 
of  respected  and  ‘‘neutral’’  local  station  organizations  directed  by  community  leaders;  a  similar 
national  organization  which  can  play  a  convening  role  in  the  key  public  and  private  partner-
ships needed. They also have highly experienced and successful local and national programming 
capabilities which can be used to build training and other content for alerts. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

message.  And,  you  mentioned  that  wireless  servers,  like  the  one  I 
have  for  this,  are  not  set  up  to  broadcast,  so  we’d  have  to  change 
their technology in order to do that. I’d like to make sure we have 
thought  of  other  options.  And  my  question,  just  a  technical  ques-
tion—this  is  designed  to  receive  a  signal  from  only  one  server.  Is 
there  any  way  this  could  be  easily  adapted  so  that,  in  an  emer-
gency,  that  it  could  receive,  directly,  a  signal  from  public  broad-
casting digital, and not even go through the central server that it’s 
designed to pick up from? 

Mr.  GUTTMAN-MCCABE.  Mr.  Chairman,  let  me  answer  that  with 
a  strong  caveat  that  it  would  probably  be  beyond  my  technical  ex-
pertise.  But  I—the  systems,  I  think,  are  designed—and  the 
handsets,  whether  it  be  a  BlackBerry  handset  or  a  wireless 
handset—are  designed  to  be  operational  solely  with  that  wireless 
provider. 

Senator DEMINT. Right. 
Mr.  GUTTMAN-MCCABE.  So,  our  industry  is  made  up  of  different 
technologies  and  different  platforms,  and,  even  within  those  plat-
forms,  there  are  different  generations  of  technologies.  That’s  part 
of  what  makes  moving  forward  with  an  emergency  alert  service  a 
difficult concept, a difficult process. 

Senator DEMINT. Well, do you think there will need to be a Fed-
eral mandate that wireless companies cooperate, that they all basi-
cally  do  the  same  thing  in  order  for  there  to  be  cooperation  from 
the wireless industry? 

Mr.  GUTTMAN-MCCABE.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  say  that  I  think 
we would support exactly the opposite contention, that if left to the 
ingenuity  and  the  creativity  of  the  industry,  you’re  going  to  get  a 
solution  that  makes  most  sense  with  the  existing  technology,  but 
also that recognizes that there will be an evolution in the networks. 
And  I  fear  that  if  something  were  to  be  mandated—and  I  think 
you, in the earlier panel, stated such fears—I fear that government 
could get it wrong and that a choice could be made on a technology 
that,  by  the  time  the  process  is  developed  and  the  standards  are 
developed and the equipment is developed, it’s already a generation 
behind what actually exists. 

So, I think I would—the industry, I think, would wholeheartedly 
support  a  voluntary  effort  and  a  cooperative  effort  with  govern-
ment. 

Senator DEMINT. Senator Nelson? 
Senator BEN NELSON. Maybe any one of you could respond to the 
concern  with  the  100,000  agencies  and  the  potential  of  multiple 
warnings instantaneously around the country. At what point do we 
run  the  risk  of  an  overload?  Is  the  capacity—that  you  currently 
have from public broadcasting—capable of receiving such warnings 
from so many different locations and then disseminating them? 

Mr.  LAWSON.  Senator,  we  have  the  capacity  even  to  do  video 
through—this  is  all  browser-based,  this  is  Internet  protocol—even 
to do video requires just a fraction of what we have. I think the—— 
Senator  BEN NELSON.  But  if  you  have  multiple  warnings—I 
doubt that you could have 100,000—coming from all at one instant 
in time, would there be an overload point for the technology? 

Mr. LAWSON. Since we’re talking about regional, for a local public 
television station, there is a limit to what we can put over the sat-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

ellite,  certainly,  but  you  wouldn’t  have  100,000  coming  in  to  us— 
one public station. You might have a dozen or so agencies. The real 
question is the overload of information that the public receives. 

Senator BEN NELSON. Well, that’s a given, yes. 
Mr. LAWSON. Right. So right now, under the analog EAS, we and 
the other broadcasters do have a responsibility to pass along Presi-
dential  messaging  in  the  event  of  a  national  emergency,  but  there 
is  a  voluntary  system  in  place,  in  terms  of  what  is  carried  from 
local  and  state  governments.  And  I  think  one  of  the  challenges  we 
face is to work out the protocols, we, in FEMA, are planning to roll 
out  a  national  Federal  alert  system.  The  challenge  of  connecting 
local  and  state  emergency  managers  to  that  system,  to  that  back-
bone, to use local stations, is partially financial, but it’s also work-
ing  out  the  exact  kinds  of  protocols  I  think  you’re  alluding  to,  in 
terms  of  what  is  emergency  data,  what  is  emergency  information, 
and what is our responsibility to pass it on, on a metropolitan-wide 
basis, if it’s only affecting a certain part of the community. 

Senator BEN NELSON. What about security? In other words, with 
the advent of so much information, the potential for warning infor-
mation to be put out in alerts, what kind of assurance can we have 
that will be authorized, that you won’t have the equivalent of spam 
or people intervening and putting out their own misinformation? 

Mr.  LAWSON.  Well,  I  can  tell  you,  in  our  situation,  we’re  looking 
at a dedicated communication link between FEMA and our satellite 
system  of  the  local  station  transmitter.  That  has  to  be  secure,  and 
it has to be hardened. And I’m sure that will be part of the rollout. 
But  in  terms  of  what  leaves  the  station,  what  leaves  the  trans-
mitter, in terms of over-the-air, it’s pretty much unhackable at that 
point.  And  we  can  encrypt  it,  so  that  only  certain  people,  author-
ized users, can have access to that information. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Therefore,  the  chances  of  an  April  Fool’s 

joke is probably remote or nonexistent. 

Mr.  LAWSON.  In  the  system  that  we’re  testing  here  in  the  na-
tional  capital  region,  yes,  sir,  I  think  it  would  be  pretty  difficult. 
Mr.  GUTTMAN-MCCABE.  Senator,  that  is  a  concern  of  ours,  and 
it’s something that we think—we agree, that is being worked. And 
part  of  the  process  of  working  with  FEMA  and  Mr.  Hoover  is  get-
ting  to  a  policy  and  a  process  whereby—as  Mr.  Hoover  mentioned, 
whereby  messages  are  originated,  at  some  point,  and  then  not 
touched as they move throughout the process. So, when they move 
through  a  wireless  network,  we—our  industry  understands  that  it 
has  not  been  corrupted,  it’s  not  corruptible,  it  has  been  authenti-
cated,  and  that  no  one  on  the  wireless  side  has  to  touch  the  mes-
sage.  And  I  think  that  is  a  key  concern  and  a  key  element  of  any 
network, going forward. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  So,  it  wouldn’t  be  as  amateurish  as  the 

signals between the pitcher and the catcher in a baseball game. 

[Laughter.] 
Mr. GUTTMAN-MCCABE. One would hope not. 
Senator BEN NELSON. All right. Thank you. 
Senator  DEMINT.  I  think  you  were  here  to  hear  the  first  panel. 
I’d be interested in your comments. We’re completing legislation at 
this  point.  I  have  a  new  sense  of  urgency  to  complete  it  and  get 
it  passed,  because  it’s  going  to  be  a  rush  to  get  it  done  before  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

FCC  completes  their  rulemaking,  without  the  legislation,  appar-
ently. But based on what you heard, what are your concerns about 
the  rulemaking,  about  the  legislation,  or  what  would  you  like  to 
make  sure  that  we  include  in  this?  And  I’ll  just  ask  each  of  you 
to give just a very brief comment before we close. 

Mr. GUTTMAN-MCCABE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
You have voiced, actually, some of our concerns, the concern that 
a technology choice will be made, or that a date certain will be set 
that  doesn’t  make  sense,  in  terms  of  development  of  a  solution. 
That’s  why  CTIA  and  the  industry  have  approached  this  with  a 
two-part  solution,  the  first  part  being  working  with  FEMA  on  the 
pilot project, utilizing an SMS-based solution, existing technologies, 
sending  a  text  message  to  devices,  and  utilizing  an  opt-in  service, 
but also simultaneously looking at some longer-term solutions that 
address issues like capacity and the ability to target messages geo-
graphically.  So,  I  would  be  concerned  and  would  want  to  ensure 
that  any  legislation,  from  our  perspective,  would  recognize  those 
limitations. 

Also, addressing issues such as an actual description of what the 
service  should  be.  It’s  difficult  for  manufacturers  to  build  a  tech-
nology  to  a  service  that  they  don’t  know  exactly  what  the  param-
eters  are,  of  yet.  Again,  who  can  send  a  message?  When  can  they 
send a message? What should the message contain? Does it contain 
data? Does it contain pictures and maps? How quickly does it have 
to be disseminated, and to whom? 

So, all of those things will inform the standards groups, and the 
standards groups will turn around and develop standards by which 
the manufacturers can build equipment. 

So, this is a process that actually is ongoing, much like Mr. Hoo-
ver  and  their  effort  to  develop  a  coordinated  government  effort. 
These  efforts  are  ongoing,  and  we  would  hope  that  any  legislation 
wouldn’t,  sort  of,  either  short-circuit  that  process  or  derail  it  in  a 
way that actually harmed the actual development of a service. 

Senator DEMINT. Mr. Taylor? 
Mr. TAYLOR. I come from a rural area of Eastern Carolina that’s 
had its share of hurricanes, but it also has its share of 911 centers 
that have invested what little bit of money they have into systems 
that  they  feel  like  they  can  work  with,  that  they  can  afford.  Our 
concern  is  that  we  don’t  need  to  go  out  and  build  new  wheels;  we 
have  wheels  that  work  right  now.  We  have  rural  areas,  we  have 
PSAPs,  we  have  emergency  managers  that  are  using  notification 
systems  that  fit  their  budgets,  that  fit  their  needs.  And  we’re  not 
wanting to change that. We want to interface all of those different 
systems, instead of going out and rebuilding a whole network. Let’s 
take  the  networks  that  we  have  today,  and  let’s  create  standards 
of  interface.  And  that’s  what  we  would  encourage,  is  that,  let’s 
work on the standards for interfacing all the different systems that 
we have. Interface the BlackBerrys, interface the wireless carriers, 
interface  the  public  television  system,  interface  NOAA.  All  these 
different  emergency  notification  systems  are  wonderful,  they  work 
great. We’re not trying to rebuild the dots, we’re just trying to draw 
the  line  between  the  dots.  And  that’s  what  we’re  concerned  with. 
We don’t want to rebuild a good system. We want to take what we 
have  and  make  it  able  to  talk  to  each  other,  able  to  communicate 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

with  each  other,  without  having  to  spend  millions  and  millions  of 
dollars replacing what’s already there. 

Senator DEMINT. Mr. Lawson? 
Mr.  LAWSON.  Mr.  Chairman,  with  public  television  we’re  talking 
about  a  classic  dual-use  opportunity.  And  our  stations  have  raised 
about  1.1  billion  to  convert  to  digital,  which  was  a  subject  of  the 
full Committee’s hearing a couple of weeks ago. Most of that’s non– 
Federal. To use a system as the backbone for a Federal emergency 
alert  system  requires  an  incremental  investment,  and  it  requires 
the continuing maintenance of the infrastructure that we have. So, 
in  our  testimony  we’re  asking  the  Committee  to  continue  to  sup-
port,  the  rebuilding  of  our  satellite  interconnection  system,  which 
is  getting  old  and  has  to  be  replaced.  And,  second,  FEMA  is  han-
dling  the  national  Presidential-messaging  part  of  our  system  from 
their  own  resources,  but  to  take—to  provide  resources  for  national 
and  local  connection  to  this  backbone,  for  national  and  local  origi-
nation,  for  messages  of  that  level,  extra  funds  are  required,  and 
that would be our request. 

Senator  DEMINT.  Thank  you.  This  has  been  most  helpful.  I  ap-
preciate  everyone  being  here,  everyone  in  our  audience  and  the 
media. 

This hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 11:30 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing  today.  In  the  aftermath  of  the 
deadly  Indian  Ocean  tsunami,  we  in  the  Senate,  like  so  many  around  the  world, 
asked  two  simple  questions:  ‘‘Why  couldn’t  we  warn  people  that  this  tsunami  was 
coming?’’ and ‘‘Would we receive an adequate warning if a disaster happened here?’’ 
Unfortunately,  the  issue  of  effective  warnings  is  more  complicated  than  it  seems 
at first blush. As we have learned over the course of the year, there are several ele-
ments to an effective warning: 

1. It must detect or predict the hazard; 
2. It must communicate the warning to those in danger; and 
3. It must offer sound advice on how to find safety. 

Our witnesses today are likely to focus on the second problem—getting the warn-
ings  to  affected  people.  Coordination  and  the  use  of  new  technologies  are  very  im-
portant.  However,  I  would  like  to  urge  our  witnesses  not  to  forget  the  other  two 
pieces  of  effective  warnings.  We  need  to  invest  in  improving  our  detection  and  pre-
diction of all hazards, including tsunami, volcano, earthquake, and weather hazards. 
In  addition,  we  must  ensure  that  people  know  what  to  do  when  they  are  warned. 
That  means  that  Federal,  state,  and  local  governments  need  to  have  a  coordinated 
response  and  need  to  educate  at-risk  communities  on  how  to  respond  to  natural  or 
man-made disasters. 

With  regard  to  communicating  warnings  to  those  in  danger,  I  am  excited  to  hear 

about new, off the shelf technologies that can improve and personalize warnings. 

Particularly  in  communications-saturated  cities,  like  Washington,  D.C.,  these 

technologies can help spread the word quickly and effectively. 

Of  course,  many  places  in  this  country,  particularly  the  Western  Pacific,  lack 
ubiquitous telecommunications. In these places, we must focus on deploying robust, 
low  tech  solutions  like  sirens  or  radios  on  a  stick  that  can  deliver  warnings  where 
they are needed. 

NOAA,  FEMA,  and  the  White  House  have  established  a  task  force  on  effective 
warnings  under  the  auspices  of  the  National  Science  and  Technology  Council.  The 
task force is working to improve both natural disaster and homeland security warn-
ings. 

As  you  continue  integrating  the  various  Federal  systems,  I  encourage  you  to  in-
volve  a  variety  of  state  and  local  emergency  managers  and  first  responders  to  en-
sure  that  we  preserve  our  existing  capabilities  at  NOAA  with  respect  to  warnings 
for weather and other natural disasters; we improve, rather than interfere with, ac-
cess  to  such  warnings  by  local  emergency  managers  and  first  responders;  and  we 
develop and deploy technologies appropriate to each community. 

The United States can do better at warning its population. I look forward to hear-
ing our witnesses help us find a way forward so that we can make people through-
out the Nation safer from whatever hazards threaten us. 

Æ 

(55) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:05 Nov 29, 2010 Jkt 062408 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62408.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

